

                   HINTS FOR GETTING MAIL

         THROUGH VARIOUS GATEWAYS TO AND FROM JANET

       edited by Tim Clark, University of Warwick, UK

                 Issue 7 - 23rd March 1990

                          CONTENTS

   Preface for Issue 7

   1. INTRODUCTION AND WARNING
       1.1 Who is the document aimed at?
       1.2 A Note on Terminology
       1.3 Upper or lower case for mail addresses?
       1.4 JANET and Its Gateways

   2. GETTING A COPY OF THIS DOCUMENT
       2.1 Fetching Files Direct from Warwick University
       2.2 Getting the Files via Electronic Mail
       2.3 Obtaining a Paper Copy
       2.4 Finding Out when new issues occur

   3. EARN (BITNET NETNORTH)
       3.1 Examples
       3.2 Getting Mail Back
       3.3 Contacts and Further Information
       3.4 Tried and Tested?

   4. INTERNET (DARPA, ARPANET, NSFNET)
       4.1 Routing Problem
       4.2 Examples
       4.3 Getting Mail Back
       4.4 Contacts and Further Information
       4.5 Tried and Tested?

   5. UUCP
       5.1 Sending via UKC
          5.1.1 Examples
          5.1.2 Contacts
       5.2 Sending Via EARN
          5.2.1 Examples
          5.2.2 Contacts
       5.3 Sending Via the Internet
          5.3.1 Examples
          5.3.2 Contacts
       5.4 Getting mail back
       5.5 Tried and Tested?

6. CSNET Phonenet
    6.1 Example
    6.2 Getting Mail Back
    6.3 Contacts
    6.4 Tried and Tested?

7. EAN and X.400 MHS RELAYS
    7.1 EAN
       7.1.1 Examples
       7.1.2 Getting Mail Back
       7.1.3 Contacts and Information
       7.1.4 Tried and Tested
    7.2 X.400 MHS-RELAY
       7.2.1 Examples
       7.2.2 Gold-400 and Wider X.400 mailing
       7.2.3 Getting Mail Back
       7.2.4 Contacts and Information
       7.2.5 Tried and Tested

8. JUNET (JAPAN)
    8.1 Examples
    8.2 Getting Mail back
    8.3 Tried and Tested
    8.4 Contact

9. MISCELLANEOUS OTHER NETWORKS
    9.1 MAILNET
    9.2 INFNET or IT.INFN - ITALY
    9.3 TUAI - NEW ZEALAND
    9.4 ACSNET and CSIRONET - AUSTRALIA
    9.5 HEANET - EIRE
    9.6 SDN - KOREA
    9.7 SPAN - SPACE PHYSICS
    9.8 Easynet - DEC
    9.9 Xerox Grapevine
    9.10 VNET - IBM
    9.11 HARNET - HONG KONG
    9.12 CANET - CHINA
    9.13 BT Telecom Gold and Gold-400
       9.13.1 Telecom Gold
    9.14 TTNS - The Times Network for Schools
    9.15 Commercial Mail Relay - Intermail
       9.15.1 Direct Addressing
       9.15.2 Addresses Embedded in The Mail
       9.15.3 Getting Mail Back
       9.15.4 Further Information
    9.16 Telemail
    9.17 MCIMAIL
    9.18 FIDO NET
    9.19 APPLE LINK
    9.20 COMPUSERVE
    9.21 INDIA
    9.22 MICROLINK

    9.23 Miscellaneous: ATT, BIX, BMUG, Connect, Geonet, Mfenet, NASAMail, Sinet
    9.24 Elsewhere

10. GREY BOOK ABROAD

11. VARIOUS PROBLEMS
    11.1 Case translation
    11.2 Line truncation
    11.3 Character translation
    11.4 Alteration of the Contents
    11.5 Characters trapped by the local mailer or Operating System
    11.6 Mail Just Disappears
    11.7 Indecipherable Mail Addressee
    11.8 Mail gets Rejected

12. OTHER INFORMATION SOURCES

13. SUMMARY

14. DOMAINS
    14.1 The Domain Problem
    14.2 Partial Domain Routing
    14.2 How to Use the Partial Domain Table
    14.4 The Partial Domain Table
    14.3 Examples

15. INDEX TO NETWORKS

16. SIGNATURES

                    Preface for Issue 7

Over a year has passed since issue 6 and again  there  is  a
lot  of new information in this issue. On the negative side:
there has been very little information received  to  resolve
some  of  the  uncertainties  mentioned  in  a number of the
sections, so many of these still remain.  My  prediction  in
the  previous  issue,  ``Now that the information is held in
form which is easy to update, future issues  are  likely  to
appear  more  frequently,''  has been shown to be hopelessly
wrong.

Major changes include:

+    Changes in the JANET/DARPA-Internet gateway.

+    Many more networks mentioned.

I am grateful for a number of  contributions  received,  and
this issue includes several sections of text, verbatim, from
contributors. The individual  authors  are  not  identified,
often  because   submissions  from a variety of authors have
been edited together. Some submissions I have not  included,
because   they  appear  to  have  been  obsoleted  by  later
submissions.  I  have  also  shamelessly  lifted  text  from
various  items  in  electronic  discussion  groups and other
public information sources.

For details of how to obtain a copy of  this  document,  see
section 2 below.

This is the last version of this guide to be issued  by  me.
Shirley  Wood  of the JANET Network Executive is taking over
the editing of these hints in  future.  Further  details  in
Section 1 below.

                           USAGE

     You are free to copy, publish,  or  make  whatever
     use  you  wish  of  this  document with or without
     acknowledgment.  I  would  be  grateful  if   this
     `Usage'  paragraph  and the `Warning' paragraph in
     section 1 were  incorporated  in  any  substantial
     quotation from it.

Tim Clark
Computing Services, University of Warwick
(my full `signature' is at the end of this document)

1. INTRODUCTION AND WARNING

This document has grown way beyond its original function  (a
contribution  to  tips  on  mail  gateways  for  circulation
amongst the Midlands universities). I am grateful  that  the
JANET   Network  Executive  are  taking  over  the  task  of
collecting, editing and disseminating such information.

As far as editing a document  containing  the  ``hints''  is
concerned,  I  unwittingly acquired the role which I am glad
to be able to relinquish at last.  I became a little worried
about  the  widespread circulation of these hints, hence the
following warning:

                          WARNING

     I do not have time to thoroughly  test  everything
     out,  follow  up references etc.  So this document
     should  only  be  regarded  as   the   basis   for
     experiment,  and  by  no  means  an  authoritative
     document.  I may be  suggesting  things  that  are
     inefficient, undesirable or just plain wrong.

Many thanks to contributors near and far.  If  you  wish  to
provide  input,  please  do  not   mail  me  any longer, but
instead mail:

                mail-hints@uk.ac.rutherford

It would be particularly useful to provide verification that
some  of the routes that I have not tested, do in fact work.
Also if there is a suggestion which you know  just  can  not
work - please provide this information.

If you received this copy  indirectly,  and  would  like  to
receive future copies, refer to section 2 `Getting a Copy of
this Document' below.

1.1 Who is the document aimed at?

This document has been written in a form to be read more  by
people  providing  a computing service than the end users of
the service. I.e. people who know something about electronic
mail's   technicalities,  but  have  not  got  the  time  or
inclination to unearth the hundreds of scraps of information
required to work out how to get mail from A to B.

If you have an `intelligent' mailer, then it may be possible
to incorporate much of the information in the mailer itself,
so the user merely has to use  the  simple  address  they've
been  given  be  their  contact.  E.g.  the  user just mails
Fred@BITNET.UZYVM,  Mary@comso.uzy.edu,  Smith@oz.tivic   or

whatever,  and  the  mailer  translates  it  into one of the
ghastly forms mentioned in this document.

This document, when giving  mail  addresses,  assumes  basic
mailers which can not handle such complexities. Many mailers
do provide more than this basic function, for example  those
which  recognize  an  `uk.ac.' name without the `uk.ac.'  So
the examples may need some  tailoring  if  they  are  to  be
presented  to  users,  rather  than  put  them off with over
complex addresses.

1.2 A Note on Terminology

In discussions of mail addresses in  a  JANET  context,  the
terms  `NRS  name' and `inverted NRS name' often crop up. To
make this document simpler  to  read  I  usually  adopt  the
convention  uk.ac.place.machine,  to  imply  use  of an `NRS
name' and machine.place.ac.uk  to  imply  an  `inverted  NRS
name'.  It  should be remembered that many addresses are not
comprised of  exactly  four  components.   E.g.  UK.AC.ESSEX
and UK.AC.CAM.CL.TRPS.

Similarly   constructs   like    domain.place.machine    and
machine.place.domain  are  used instead of the more accurate
(but  also  perhaps  more  obtuse)  terms  `big-endian'  and
`little-endian' respectively.

For readers outside JANET, `NRS' is  the  Name  Registration
Scheme  run  by  the  JANET Network Executive which, amongst
other things, acts as the naming authority for JANET.

As the document was originally  circulated  only  amongst  a
small  group  of  people,  I  used  the  term  `FTP' without
explanation. By this I meant the  UK  NIFTP  (or  Blue  Book
FTP).  To  an  Internet  user  FTP would more naturally mean
Internet FTP. So I now stick  to  the  term  NIFTP  instead.
Hopefully  this  will not confuse JANET readers, to whom the
term NIFTP may be more strange!

Italics are used extensively for meaning, `Replace this with
the  actual  name.'  For  example in the EARN section below,
there    is     the     suggestion     that     you     mail
`person%earn.sitename@uk.ac.earn-relay'. Faced with a person
whose usercode/username/mail-id is `MARY' at  an  EARN  site
whose node name is `chmerv', this then becomes:

     MARY%earn.chmerv@uk.ac.earn-relay

Unfortunately the use of italics will be lost on  those  who
only   have   a   plain  ASCII  version  of  this  document.
Fortunately  this  construct  should  be  determinable  from
context alone.

When chosing the examples, I've tried to use  ficticous  end

sites  and  users.   Similarly  when  giving an example of a
hypothetical gateway, the name will normally be false.  Real
names  of  gateways are used where the example is suggesting
that you use that gateway.

1.3 Upper or lower case for mail addresses?

Most of the time it doesn't matter whether an address is  in
upper  case  or  lower  case  - the two are often treated as
equivalent. Some machines on UUCP do  insist  on  their  own
name  being  in  lower case and some machines (usually Unix)
insist on the user's name being in the correct case (usually
lower).

This document uses rather a mixture. The best approach is to
leave an address in the same case as it was supplied to you.
So   if    someone    tells    you    their    address    is
`JBSmith%comsad@brucsim.uucp', you perhaps mail:

     JBSmith%comsad%uucp.brucsim@uk.ac.ukc

or   JBSmith%comsad%uucp.brucsim@UK.AC.UKC

or   JBSmith%comsad%brucsim.uucp%NET.uu.uunet@Uk.Ac.Earn-
     Relay

leaving the components of the address that the user gave you
in the same case as they were supplied.

Note the problem with case conversion discussed  in  section
11.1 below.

1.4 JANET and Its Gateways

First a very brief introduction to JANET and its mail.

JANET is a network which connects the academic community  in
the  UK: all universities, most polytechnics and a number of
government research establishments (e.g. SERC,  NERC,  MRC).
It  is  an  X.25  based  network which carries other traffic
besides electronic mail, interactive and file  transfer  for
example.

On JANET the NIFTP protocol is used to convey mail, the mail
itself conforms basically to RFC 822. This combination being
defined  in  the   `JNT   Mail',   or   `Grey   Book   Mail'
specification.

Mail on JANET  is  generally  point-to-point;  that  is  the
service  sending  the  mail  makes  direct  contact with the
service which is to receive the mail.

Sites which connect to JANET usually have  their  own  local
area  networks.   These  may use the same protocols as JANET

and so participate in  end-to-end  connection,  or  in  some
cases  mail  may  be  transferred across a site to a service
which will deliver the mail over JANET.

The mail gateways on JANET are attached to JANET  just  like
all  services  on  JANET. The difference is, of course, that
these gateways are connected to other networks too.

A diagram may be  useful  here,  but  is  too  difficult  to
include  in  the  variety  of  formats that this document is
available in. So imagine a `cloud'  network,  to  which  all
services  named UK.AC.something are connected. Amongst these
are the following  gateway  sites  with  links  off  to  the
networks they are each connected to:

UK.AC.EARN-RELAY     A  service  at  the   SERC   Rutherford
                     Appleton  Laboratory which is also node
                     UKACRL in the EARN network. See section
                     3.

UK.AC.EAN-RELAY      A service at the University  of  London
                     Computer  Centre  which also takes part
                     in the EAN network by a  connection  to
                     the  Public  Packet Switch Data Network
                     (called PSS in the UK). See section 7.

UK.AC.MHS-RELAY      A service at the University  of  London
                     Computer   Centre  for  handling  X.400
                     mail.   The  X.400  mail  is  sent  and
                     received  over the Public Packet Switch
                     Data Network (called PSS  in  the  UK).
                     See section 7.

UK.AC.NSFNET-RELAY   A service at the University  of  London
                     Computer  Centre  which is also part of
                     the Internet, being linked directly  by
                     transatlantic  leased line. (Though PSS
                     can also be used  as  a  back-up.)  See
                     section 4.

UK.AC.UKC            The University of Kent  at  Canterbury.
                     One  of  its  services  is a connection
                     into  the  uucp  network.  It  is   the
                     pricipal  UK  backbone  site  for  uucp
                     traffic, though  some  other  sites  on
                     JANET handle local uucp traffic too.

2. GETTING A COPY OF THIS DOCUMENT

The document exists in a number of different formats:

file                    contents

mail-gateways.7.txt     A readable text file which  can  be
                        displayed on dumb printers and VDUs

mail-gateways.7.ms      The   format   the   document    is
                        maintained  in, suitable for use on
                        systems with tbl  and  ditroff  (or
                        troff) with the ms macros.

mail-gateways.7.latex   LaTeX input. Suitable  for  use  on
                        systems  with  LaTeX  and TeX.  Not
                        available until 19th April 1990.

mail-gateways.7.ps      PostScript.  Suitable  for  sending
                        direct to a PostScript printer.

2.1 Fetching Files Direct from Warwick University

To do this you need access to NIFTP and JANET. Do  an  NIFTP
setting the FILENAME to the appropriate file chosen from the
list above. Specify it  in  upper-case  or  lower-case,  but
don't  used mixed-case.  Set the USERNAME to anon (or ANON),
and do  not  specify  a  USERNAME  PASSWORD.   The  site  is
UK.AC.WARWICK.CU.  If  this  name is not known to your NIFTP
(it was registered in  NIFTP  context  on  22  March  1990),
UK.AC.WARWICK.SOL  can  be used until its expected departure
in June 1990.

2.2 Getting the Files via Electronic Mail

Nottingham  University  Computer  Science  Department   have
kindly  agreed  to  hold  the document and make it available
with  their  `info-server'.    Send   electronic   mail   to
info-server@uk.ac.nott.cs with the body of the message:

     Request: sources
     Topic: filename chosen from list above
     Request: end

The topic line can be repeated for each  file  you  wish  to
collect.

E.g.
     Request: sources
     Topic: mail-gateways.7.txt
     Topic: mail-gateways.7.ps
     Request: end

It will also supply a list of the files  available  in  this
category if sent the mail:

     Request: catalogue
     Topic: mail-gateways
     Request: end

For additional information, like how to  get  the  files  in
several  chunks  (if your mailer doesn't like receiving huge
files), just send an empty message to it (or, if your mailer
refuses  to  send  an  empty  message,  send  something  the
info-server won't recognize, e.g. `boo!').

If all else fails, mail me (see my `signature' at the  end),
telling  me  what you want, what's gone wrong, and I'll mail
you a copy.

2.3 Obtaining a Paper Copy

If you really do want a paper copy from me, then write to me
at  the address shown at the end of this document, enclosing
a cheque for 3.00 (sterling) made payable to `The University
of Warwick'. If outside the UK, but within the EC, then it's
4.00 (sterling) or the equivalent of 6.00 (sterling) if  the
cheque  is  not  made  out  in  sterling. Outside the EC the
corresponding  amounts  are  13.00  (sterling)   and   15.00
(sterling).  These  prices  are  just  the  cost of copying,
postage, and dealing with non-sterling cheques.

2.4 Finding Out when new issues occur

If you want to be notified when a new issue is ready, please
mail:

            mail-hints-request@uk.ac.rutherford

3. EARN (BITNET NETNORTH)

For sites on BITNET and EARN,  the  sitename  is  usually  a
fairly  horrid  code  of 4 to 8 characters. Alternatively it
may be in the domain form,  machine.place.domain,  in  which
case  it  can  be  a  real  problem  deciding that this is a
BITNET/EARN address. This problem is discussed in section 14
below.

If it is in the simple 4 to 8 character format, then it will
follow the style below.

In Europe it is a country code (1 or 2 characters)  followed
by  some  identifier  which  has  often  been allocated by a
naming convention with  one  or  two  character  fields  for
city/region, site, machine etc. Very rarely the country code
is separated by a space from the rest. This space  MUST  NOT
be  inserted into the address. E.g. D B0ZIB21 should be used
as  DB0ZIB21  (the  D  means  it's   in   Germany   (Federal
Republic)).    An    almost   obsolete   practice   is   for
correspondents to refer to  EARN  as  `country  prefixEARN',
e.g.  DEARN  or  FREARN.   In  such  cases one has to decide
whether  the  country  prefix  has  been  prepended  to  the
sitename, and prepend it if necessary.

On BITNET/NETNORTH sites names are  often  more  meaningful.
They sometimes have dot BITNET appended to them; this can be
left out, or prepended instead.

The method is to mail:   person%sitename@uk.ac.earn-relay
                   or:   person%earn.sitename@uk.ac.earn-relay
              or even:   person%bitnet.sitename@uk.ac.earn-relay

The   use   of   EARN.sitename   or    BITNET.sitename    is
interchangeable,  the  network  behaves as one network, with
the different parts administered by  different  managements.
So,  should  you  wish, you could prefix a node name on EARN
with `BITNET.', or a node on BITNET with `EARN.'.

The relay also accepts the address  given  with  EARN/BITNET
appended  to  the sitename, thought it's safer to prepend it
in case there is a clash between the address and the name of
another domain.

       E.g.   person%sitename.earn@uk.ac.earn-relay
        or:   person%sitename.bitnet@uk.ac.earn-relay

UK.AC.EARN-RELAY was once known as  UK.AC.RL.EARN.  The  old
name was deleted after a substantial overlap period.

Local mailers may wish to make use of the above, so that  if

a  user presents an address in the form person@earn.sitename
(or  person@bitnet.sitename)  the  mail  is   forwarded   to
UK.AC.EARN-RELAY. However, as mentioned in the introduction,
the document assumes basic mailers.

3.1 Examples

  Address as given by
  remote correspondent   who to mail

  user RZS01 at EARN     RZS01%frsl003@uk.ac.earn-relay
  node FRSL003

  PRJOHAN@DGOGWD01       PRJOHAN%dgogwd01@uk.ac.earn-relay

  SKLOD on DK BN07       SKLOD%dkbn07@uk.ac.earn-relay

  LEAR@HAMLET.BITNET     LEAR%hamlet@uk.ac.earn-relay

3.2 Getting Mail Back

The method is that the EARN/BITNET user mails:

     person@machine.place.ac.uk

or less preferably:

     person%uk.ac.place.machine@UKACRL

The first form is now much more widespread - sometime ago  I
had never found anywhere which could handle that form.  (The
remote site's tables and mail software have  to  know  about
the  fact  that  UKACRL  is  a  relay, known within EARN and
BITNET as AC.UK, and many sites took a while to do this).

The second form works at a number of  sites  which  can  not
cope  with  the  first  form,  but  that  still  leaves some
BITNET/EARN sites which run ancient mailers which  can  only
cope with very simple addressing styles of the style:

     max-8-chars-user-id@max-8-chars-node-name

A good standby for US correspondents is to  advise  them  to
use  the  Internet  for reply, if they are allowed to do so.
Many either know how to route  mail  via  the  Internet,  or
faced  with a decrepit mailer could use another machine with
access to the Internet.  Some  mailers  would  interpret  an
address  of the first form as an Internet address anyway, so
the mail would come  back  via  UCL  (see  Internet  section
below).

If you wish to force the mail to come back over the Atlantic

on EARN/BITNET then quote your Internet address as:

     person%machine.place.ac.uk@cunyvm.cuny.edu

If all the above fails, then you  may  need  to  advise  the
remote correspondent as follows:

     If none of these address forms work, you may  have
     to  consult  your  network  manager.  It should be
     explained  to  him/her  that,  to  send  mail  via
     Earn/BitNet/NetNorth  to JANET, the address in the
     envelope must be quite different from the  address
     in  the  RFC-822  header.  In particular, the mail
     envelope  must  specify   MAILER@UKACRL   as   the
     intended  recipient,  whereas  the  RFC-822 header
     should contain (as the value of the `To: ' field),
     the    address    form    outlined   above.   I.e.
     person@machine.place.ac.uk

     This file should be sent as a PUNCH file  to  user
     MAILER at EARN node UKACRL with class M.

3.3 Contacts and Further Information

Information on the EARN gateway is held on  the  JANET  NEWS
machine (make an interactive call to UK.AC.JANET.NEWS).

Further information on EARN can be  gained  by  fetching  an
information    file    from    the    relay    by    mailing
netserv@uk.ac.earn-relay with a line containing:

     GET JANET EARNGATE

Other files worth GETting from NETSERV are:

   NETSERV FILELIST   for a full list of files available
   NEWS SUMMARY       for the latest news

There  is  an  EARN  Usergroup  discussion   mailing   list,
EARNUS@UK.AC.RL. To join, apply to EARNUS-REQUEST@UK.AC.RL

Problems with use of the EARN gateway are  handled  by  User
Support, US@UK.AC.RL.IB

3.4 Tried and Tested?

Users throughout JANET have been sending mail to  people  on
EARN,  and  getting  replies back for sometime now. It works
very well. The only problems seem to be  with  some  ancient
mailers at the other end which can not reply.

EARN and BITNET are largely `store & forward' networks  (not
`point-to-point  like  JANET). So mail has to be temporarily

stored on one intermediate nodes and  forwarded  on  to  the
next.  This can cause delays if an intermediate site suffers
problems which cause a  backlog.  The  effect  is  that  the
majority  of  the  mail  is  moved  very  speedily,  with an
occasional long delay.

4. INTERNET (DARPA, ARPANET, NSFNET)

UK.AC.NSFNET-RELAY is the official gateway to the  Internet.
(The  machine is physically located at, and administered by,
ULCC - The University of London Computer Centre.)

The relay was  previously  known  as  UK.AC.UCL.CS.NSS,  and
major improvements have taken place in the last year.

Mail to the Internet can also be sent via  the  EARN  relay.
Many  users  made  use  of  the  EARN  route when there were
restrictions  on  the  use  of  UK.AC.UCL.CS.NSS,  and  more
recently  because  of  other  problems  like  lack of domain
routing and problems with the high speed link with the  USA.
It is now well worth using UK.AC.NSFNET-RELAY.

The method works for obsoleted ARPA addresses, ending .arpa,
and  the  current Internet ones which end: .edu, .com, .gov,
.net, or .org.  simply change the @ in the address  to  a  %
and  mail  to UK.AC.NSFNET-RELAY (or to UK.AC.EARN-RELAY for
the EARN route).

The old  style  of  addresses  (ending  .arpa)  are  rapidly
becoming  defunct, and if you are still managing to use such
an address, it is worth finding out the  new  style  address
before  the  old one fails to work. (See below for how to do
this.)

Although both UK.AC.NSFNET-RELAY  and  UK.AC.EARN-RELAY  can
handle   the   Internet   address   in  either  order.  I.e.
machine.place.domain   or   domain.place.machine,   it    is
advisable to give it in the order domain.place.machine. Note
this is the opposite order to how someone  on  the  Internet
would normally quote their address. But if the address given
you already contains a  `%'  do  not  change  the  order  of
anything to the left of that `%'.

4.1 Routing Problem

UK.AC.NSFNET-RELAY has moved from using  one  big  table  to
look  up  an  address, to one of `domain server systems' and
`domain routing'. I.e. systems know where to send mail for a
particular  domain  or  sub-domain when they do not know the
exact address of the particular site.  The result of this is
that many US sites don't now register individual machines on
Internet; the tables were getting too big anyway.

If the system you are trying to mail is on the Internet, the
mail  should  find  its  way through. However, there are the
occasional problems where mail will succeed one day and fail
the next. This can be due to routers being unable to resolve
an address quickly enough and so rejecting  the  mail.  Such
problems  should  become rarer since `domain routing' is now

widely used on the Internet.

The main problem with mail failure on the Internet, is  that
the  address is not actually on the Internet. This is due to
what I call the `domain problem' in section 14.

4.2 Examples

The  first  example  shows  a  number  of  the  alternatives
mentioned. In the case of the remainder, just one address is
shown - it's the one that is probably the  most  certain  to
work.

Address as given by
remote correspondent        who to mail

MJONES@uxyvax.arpa          MJONES%arpa.uxyvax@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
                       or   MJONES%arpa.uxyvax@uk.ac.earn-relay

DBROWN@hp1.hplabs.com       DBROWN%com.hplabs.hp1@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

Mary@isten.hous.edu         Mary%edu.hous.isten@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

tbgc%vrg.uxy@gate.uxy.edu   tbgc%vrg.uxy%edu.uxy.gate@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

4.3 Getting Mail Back

This is reasonable easy; quote your address as:

                 person@machine.place.ac.uk

sophisticated mailers at the other end may choose  to  route
mail  back  either via EARN/BITNET or Internet, depending on
their preference. Due to `domain routing', the vast majority
of  Internet  sites of cope with this.  However, for the few
which  can't,  it's  worth  giving  your  explicit  Internet
address as:

       person%machine.place.ac.uk@nsfnet-relay.ac.uk

I think all Internet sites should be able  to  handle  that,
but in case of desperation it may be worth keeping a further
form up your sleeve if all else fails:

         person%machine.place.ac.uk@cunyvm.cuny.edu

This would cause the mail to come back via EARN/BITNET.

4.4 Contacts and Further Information

Full details of the UK.AC.NSFNET-RELAY gateway are  held  on
by     its     `info-server'.     Send    some    mail    to
info-server@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay containing:

     Request: userguide
     Topic: index
     Request: end

And you should  get  some  mail  back  telling  you  of  the
documents  which  can  be  collected  by the same mechanism,
replacing the word `index' with the file you wish  to  grab.
For  further  details  of  how to use this info-server, just
send an empty message to it (or, if your mailer  refuses  to
send  an empty message, send something the info-server won't
recognize, e.g. `boo!').

To find the details of a site on  the  Internet,  send  some
mail to:

          service%arpa.sri-nic@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

with either the `Subject:' field or the text of the message:

                     whois some-keyword

The gateway contact at ULCC is:  Liaison@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay,
but  if you are going via EARN/BITNET, the contacts for EARN
above may be more appropriate.

4.5 Tried and Tested?

Vast  amounts  of  mail  to  the  Internet  are  handled  by
UK.AC.NSFNET-RELAY.   In   addition  UK.AC.EARN-RELAY  still
handles a  lot  of  traffic  to  the  Internet.   The  great
majority  of  Internet  users  are  able  to  reply  without
problem.

5. UUCP

UUCP is the general name given to a network of  mostly  Unix
computers.  There  are  different  names for it in different
parts of the World. In North America  it's  often  known  as
Usenet,  in  Europe  as Eunet, and in the UK as UKnet. It is
largely a store-and-forward network, where a  mail  item  is
passed from machine to machine, often using dial-up lines.

Older uucp address tend to  be  sprinkled  with  exclamation
marks,  as  they specify the route, left to right.  Strictly
speaking  then  you  needed  to  know  the  route,  but  the
`backbone' sites knew the route to other backbone sites, and
so you just needed to specify the route from a backbone site
such  as  ukc  or  cwi.nl  (previously mcvax), in Europe, or
seismo, (now effectively replaced by uunet.uu.net),  in  the
USA.

These days almost all uucp sites are registered in the  uucp
`world  maps' - lists of which sites are connected to which.
If a site is in the maps you  can  simply  refer  to  it  as
`site.uucp'  (Rest-of-the-World)  or  `uucp.site'  (UK).  If
your machine recognizes `uucp' as a partial domain (i.e.  it
can  route such an address to an appropriate gateway without
you needing to specify the gateway) then hopefully  that  is
all  you  need  to  know - simply use person@uucp.site.  But
note that this will only work if that site is  in  the  uucp
maps,  see  below.   You  can  also, it seems, address sites
which are not in the maps but whose connection to  a  mapped
machine  you  know  -  see  the gateway specific information
below.

You can check if a `.uucp' style name is in the uucp maps by
sending  a message to `netdir@uk.ac.ukc' with a subject line
containing the name of the machine (without the `.uucp').  A
message  containing  the  map  entry  for  that  machine  is
returned if it exists, or an error message  if  it  doesn't.
Note  that this only applies for place.uucp. Netdir will not
return information about  domains  it  recognises  and  will
successfully route the mail to.

The system cwi.nl (in Amsterdam)  previously  had  the  name
mcvax.  (Well its a completely different machine if you want
to be pedantic.) In place of seismo,  formerly  a  major  US
backbone site, use instead uunet.uu.net which has taken over
most of seismo's traffic.

5.1 Sending via UKC

It is possible to send mail to uucp sites via UKC.  However,
one needs to register the SITE with UKC to do this, agreeing
to meet the bills  incurred,  as  a  site.   The  bills  are
usually  very  low, unless a lot of transatlantic traffic is
involved.  The cost is highest for transatlantic mail,  much

lower  for European mail, and zero for UK mail.  Practically
we've [Warwick]  found  it  best  to  subscribe,  since  the
traffic  is  very  low,  even  though  we currently place no
restriction upon access to it. Sites with the mail  software
to  cope  with  charging  may  pass  on  the  costs  to  the
department or user incurring the bills.

If a site is in the maps you can probably send mail to

                 person%uucp.site@UK.AC.UKC

(It may well work without the ``uucp.'', but it does no harm
to make your intentions clear.)

UKC will also accept translations of !-strings  in  standard
relayed        form       `person%site1@uucp.site2'       or
`person%site1%uucp.site2@uk.ac.ukc'  -  each  of  these   is
equivalent  to `...site2!site1!person' where the `...' means
`whatever is connected to site2'.

If you really must use `!'s then you can include them in the
user's  name  section  of the address enclosing it in double
quotes to  protect  it  from  your  mail  system  (it's  not
strictly  legal without the quotes, though some mailers will
cope with it).  Double quotes can  cause  problems  to  some
systems the mail is sent from, see section 11.5

Thus you could address:

                 ...site2!site1!person
            as   "site2!site1!person"@uk.ac.ukc

5.1.1 Examples

Assume that mondib, tiped and ucyvax have been  checked  out
against netdir@uk.ac.ukc

Address as given by
remote correspondent                        who to mail

...seismo!lll-crg!mondib!jones    try       jones%uucp.mondib@uk.ac.ukc
                                  or        jones%mondib%uucp.lll-crg@uk.ac.ukc
                                  or even   jones%mondib%lll-crg%net.uu.uunet@uk.ac.ukc

...mcvax!seismo!tiped!martin      martin%uucp.tiped@uk.ac.ukc

...{ihnp4 seismo}!ucyvax!mary     mary@uucp.ucyvax@uk.ac.ukc

...ihnp4!gateck!dcbtla!jeh

          Now let's assume that dcbtla
          doesn't check out against the
          directory (netdir@uk.ac.ukc),
          so we can't use
          jeh%uucp.dcbtla@uk.ac.ukc.
          However, gateck checks out as
          OK, so it's:
                                  jeh%dcbtla%uucp.gateck@uk.ac.ukc

5.1.2 Contacts

Contact point for the UKC UUCP Gateway is:   uknet@uk.ac.ukc

5.2 Sending Via EARN

The EARN node at Rutherford recognizes  the  domain  `uucp',
and  passes  the mail to a gateway site in the USA.  This in
turn knows about the uucp world maps.   If  the  address  is
given as:

     person@site

or

     person@site.uucp

then use

     person%uucp.site@uk.ac.earn-relay

If   the   address   is   given   as   a   !-style   address
(...site1!site2!final-site!user)  pick  out  the final site,
and send the mail to:

     user%UUCP.final-site@UK.AC.EARN-RELAY

If final-site  is  not  in  the  uucp  maps  (send  mail  to
netdir@uk.ac.ukc  to  check  -  see  above) then you can try
either of

     user%final-site%UUCP.site2@UK.AC.EARN-RELAY

or if you really must:

     final-site!user%uucp.site2@uk.ac.earn-relay

If you do have to use this sort of  address,  try  to  avoid
multiple trips across the Atlantic. This means knowing where
the sites in the route are.

Mail routed as UUCP.site@UK.AC.EARN-RELAY  will  get  routed
via  an  EARN  (BITNET) UUCP gateway in the USA. If you know
the uucp site you are mailing  to  is  in  Europe,  you  can

specify a more efficient route by

     user%site.uucp%gateway@uk.ac.earn-relay

Where gateway is one of:

   mcvax     The EARN name for cwi.nl in the Netherlands
   unido     In Germany
   ariadne   In Greece

Here are the examples from above, but this time  routed  via
EARN  and  making  the same assumptions about checks against
netdir@uk.ac.ukc. There is an additional  example  where  we
assume itacen is a valid, European, uucp site.

5.2.1 Examples

Address as given by
remote correspondent             who to mail

...seismo!lll-crg!mondib!jones   jones%uucp.mondib@uk.ac.earn-relay

...mcvax!seismo!tiped!martin     martin%uucp.tiped@uk.ac.earn-relay

...{ihnp4 seismo}!ucyvax!mary    mary%uucp.ucyvax@uk.ac.earn-relay

...ihnp4!gateck!dcbtla!jeh       jeh%dcbtla%uucp.gateck@uk.ac.earn-relay

...mcvax!itacen!chris            chris%itacen.uucp%mcvax@uk.ac.earn-relay
                            or   chris%uucp.itacen@uk.ac.earn-relay

5.2.2 Contacts

Contacts would be the usual EARN gateway ones (see above)

5.3 Sending Via the Internet

Site uunet.uu.net is on  both  the  Internet  and  the  uucp
network,  so  it  could  be  used  as  an alternative route.
uunet.uu.net knows about the uucp  world  maps,  so  if  the
address is given as:

     person@site

or

     person@site.uucp

then use

     person%site.uucp%net.uu.uunet@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

If   the   address   is   given   as   a   !-style   address
(...site1!site2!final-site!user)  pick  out  the final site,
and send the mail to:

     user%final-site.uucp%net.uu.uunet@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

If final-site  is  not  in  the  uucp  maps  (send  mail  to
netdir@uk.ac.ukc  to  check  -  see  above) then you can try
either of

     user%final-site%site2.uucp%net.uu.uunet@uk.ac.nsfnet-
     relay

or if you really must:

     final-site!user%site2.uucp%net.uu.uunet@uk.ac.nsfnet-
     relay

If you do have to use this sort of address please note  that
backbone sites ukc, cwi.nl (mcvax), unido and ariadne are in
Europe, and the gateway is in the USA, so don't put these in
your path if the mail is going to the USA.

Here are the examples from above, but this time  routed  via
the   Internet   and   uunet.uu.net   and  making  the  same
assumptions about checks against netdir@uk.ac.ukc

5.3.1 Examples

Address as given by
remote correspondent             who to mail

...seismo!lll-crg!mondib!jones   jones%mondib.uucp%net.uu.uunet@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

...mcvax!seismo!tiped!martin     martin%tiped.uucp%net.uu.uunet@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

...{ihnp4 seismo}!ucyvax!mary    mary%ucyvax.uucp%net.uu.uunet@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

...ihnp4!gateck!dcbtla!jeh       jeh%dcbtla%gateck.uucp%net.uu.uunet@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

5.3.2 Contacts

Contacts would be  the  usual  Internet  gateway  ones  (see
above)

5.4 Getting mail back

With the spread of domainised  addressing  most  uucp  sites
should  now  be  able  to  send mail directly to JANET sites
using the standard Rest-of- the-World form:

     person@machine.place.ac.uk

This will direct the  mail  by  whatever  route  the  system
prefers,  possibly  via  UKC  or perhaps via the Internet or
EARN/BITNET (see separate sections). If your site subscribes
to  UKC  for  use  of  uucp  mail, then you have no worries.
However, if that route is unavailable to you, then you  need
to make sure that the mail does not come back via UKC, as it
will be discarded there. So either give an Internet  address
as mentioned above in the Internet section e.g.:

     person%machine.place.ac.uk@nsfnet-relay.ac.uk

Machines which can still only use  !-style  addressing  will
probably have to route explicitly via UKC.

     ...!ukc!machine.place.ac.uk!person

However, that's no good if your site  doesn't  subscribe  to
UUCP use at UKC. In which case you could always try:

     ...!psuvax1!cunyvm.bitnet!machine.place.ac.uk!person

5.5 Tried and Tested?

Much of the new text in this section was originally supplied
by  Edinburgh, and has been updated to reflect the change of
access to the Internet.  Both Edinburgh and Warwick  make  a
lot  of  use  of  UUCP and normally route via UKC which is a
reliable UUCP backbone site returning helpful error messages
when  it  has  been  unable  to relay the mail. If a failure
occurs at some  remote  UUCP  site,  then  return  of  error
messages  is  less  reliable.  Although mail sent to US UUCP
sites via EARN can be fast, the success rate is not as  high
as via UKC. Possibly this is as a result of case translation
(see section 11.1 below). The  Internet  route  to  US  UUCP
sites is probably well worth trying, but I have not had many
reports of its performance as yet.

Since both Edinburgh and Warwick subscribe to UKC, little is
known  about  the  success  of the return routes which avoid
UKC.

6. CSNET Phonenet

CSNET is not really a network as such, but a logical network
which  makes  use  of  a  number  of  real networks. As mail
between these real networks is becoming easier  to  achieve,
the  use  of CSNET as a logical network is going out of use,
and sites in this CSNET are  moving  over  to  addresses  in
whichever real network they are in.

If you are faced with an address which contains  the  domain
`csnet',  then  the  best thing to do with it is to route it
via Internet address relay.cs.net.

E.g.

     user%somewhere.csnet%net.cs.relay@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

or

     user%somewhere.csnet%net.cs.relay@uk.ac.earn-relay

6.1 Example

Address as given by
remote correspondent   who to mail

DBROWN@zodnap.csnet    DBROWN%zodnap.csnet%net.cs.relay@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
                  or   DBROWN%zodnap.csnet%net.cs.relay@uk.ac.earn-relay

6.2 Getting Mail Back

As much mail to CSNET goes via Internet, then  the  standard
way of quoting your address internationally is best, as most
Internet sites will handle this. I.e.

     person@machine.place.ac.uk

If the CSNET machine can't handle this, it may be  that  the
only  Internet  site it knows is the CSNET/Internet gateway,
and so it will need:

     person%machine.place.ac.uk%nsfnet-
     relay%ac.uk@relay.cs.net

6.3 Contacts

The CSNET general postmaster's Internet address is:

     cic@sh.cs.net

and    can    therefore    be     reached     by     mailing

cic%net.cs.sh@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

6.4 Tried and Tested?

As mentioned  above,  specific  CSNET  addresses  are  being
replaced  by  addresses  on the real network the site actual
resides on, so the information above may become out of date.
It  is  based  on  experience  at Aston, Edinburgh and Kings
College London.

7. EAN and X.400 MHS RELAYS

EAN is a project involving the  connection  of  sites  which
have been using an early `intercept' of the X.400 protocols.

The main  gateway  to  EAN  is  called  UK.AC.EAN-RELAY,  or
UK.AC.EAN  for  short,  and  is  sited  at the University of
London Computer Centre (ULCC). It was  originally  sited  at
UCL.

ULCC also  operate  another  gateway  to  X.400  mail,  this
service was also at UCL and has only recently moved to ULCC.
It  is  called  UK.AC.MHS-RELAY.   Previously   UK.AC.UCL.CS
handled this service.

7.1 EAN

In EAN the names of the participating sites are often in the
dot  separated form used by many other networks, and use the
ordering  machine.place.domain  (where  domain  is  often  a
country    code).     Within    the    UK    the    ordering
domain.place.machine is used.

Below is a list of domains that EAN-RELAY currently handles.
These  overlap  with  domains  handled  by other gateways on
JANET, as described in section 14, the `domain problem'.  So
to  help  immediately  exclude  sub-domains  which  are  not
handled by EAN-RELAY, if all sites reachable  via  EAN-RELAY
fall  in  the same sub-domain, then that sub-domain is given
below   (domain.place.machine    order).     However,    the
description  on  the  right  is  normally  that of the whole
domain, not just the sub-domain.

If a domain name is marked as `now extinct', don't  use  it.
For  those  that  are  marked  `former  name',  or  `will be
replacing', either name is allowable for an overlap period.

domain or
sub-domain           Description

at.ptt               Austria
au.mu.munnari        University of Melbourne, Australia
be.rtt.fundp.info    Belgium research network
br.ebt.rnp.unicamp   Brazil
ca                      will be replacing `cdn'
cdn                  CDNnet, Canada
cern                 European Organization for Nuclear Research, Geneva
ch                   Swiss University Network, Switzerland
de.dpb               Deutsche Forshungsnetz, Germany
dfn                     now extinct - replaced by `de.dpb'
dk                   Danish University Network, Denmark
dunet                   former name for `dk'
es.iris-dcp          Spanish Research Network

fi                      will be replacing `funet'
funet                Finnish University Network
hasler.kom.vax2      HASLER AG, Bern, Switzerland
ie.ucd               Irish Research Network (but see section 9.5)
iris                    now extinct - replaced by `es'
irl                     former name for `ie'
isanet.hi.rhi        Icelandic University Network
kr                   Korean Research Network
nz                   New Zealand (Grey Book - but see section 9.3)
osiride.cnr.iasi     Italian Research Network
oz                   Autralian Computer Science Network
pt.ctt.inesc         Portuguese Research Network
riup                    former name for `pt'
se                   Swedish University Network
surf.kun             Dutch Research Network, Netherlands
uninett              Norwegian University Network
yu.jumail            Yugoslavia

For information on how to obtain a fuller list, see below.

The gateway accepts the addresses in  either  the  UK  style
ordering,  shown  above,  or  its  inverse;  though UK style
ordering is recommended.

Note that the relay won't necessarily handle  all  addresses
in  the  domains  shown,  only  those  in the ean.sites list
mentioned below.

7.1.1 Examples

Address as given by
remote correspondent         who to mail

glp@lge.ethz.ch              glp%ch.ethz.lge@uk.ac.ean-relay
                        or   glp%lge.ethz.ch@uk.ac.ean-relay
                             (the other address below may
                              also be given in this form)

S1DM@instr.camosun.bcc.cdn   S1DM%cdn.bcc.camosun.instr@uk.ac.ean-relay

7.1.2 Getting Mail Back

EAN sites are built around the idea  of  handling  different
mail  systems,  so  there  should be no problems getting the
mail back.  The official thing to  do  is  just  quote  your
standard  NRS  format,  but  invert  the  components to save
upsetting those who haven't  come  across  the  UK  ordering
before!

I.e. person@machine.place.ac.uk

7.1.3 Contacts and Information

Information on the EAN gateway is held  on  the  JANET  NEWS
machine (make an interactive call to UK.AC.JANET.NEWS).

For further information, five documents are  available  from
UK.AC.EAN-RELAY These are:

     <DOCS>ean.usage       full details how to use the relay.
     <DOCS>ean.sites       the list of sites handled.
     <DOCS>ean.sites.raw   the site list without explanatory text.
     <DOCS>oz.sites        a list of sites on ACSNET reachable via EAN.
     <DOCS>ean.news        the latest news

All are available doing an NIFTP to  UK.AC.EAN-RELAY  giving
the  name  of  the  document  as  the FILENAME, guest as the
USERNAME and your mail address as the PASSWORD.

The documents may also be fetched using mail: send  mail  to
information@uk.ac.ean-relay  with  the  `Subject:' field the
name of the file, without the initial `<DOCS>'.

The contact for help and advice is:

     liaison@uk.ac.ean-relay

7.1.4 Tried and Tested

As long as you are  attempting  to  mail  a  site  which  is
mentioned  in  <DOCS>ean.sites  there  is  every  chance  of
success. Beware of addresses which at  first  site  look  as
though  one  of  these relays can handle it (because the top
domain is one handled by one of these relays), though closer
inspection   will   reveal   that  the  address  is  not  in
<DOCS>ean.sites. This is the `domain problem', discussed  in
section 14.

7.2 X.400 MHS-RELAY

The transfer of the function  of  relaying  X.400  mail  was
underway, but not fully complete as I finished this document
on 23 March 1990. Previously handled  by  UK.AC.UCL.CS,  the
service  is  now  to  be provided by UK.AC.MHS-RELAY. If you
make use of this document very shortly after its issue date,
you may have to use UK.AC.UCL.CS for a week or two instead.

The domains handled by the X.400 gateway at  UK.AC.MHS-RELAY
are:

domain or
sub-domain                Description

fr                        French Research Network
gb                        United Kingdom, comprising:
  gb.gold-400.hp.hpl         Hewlett Packard
  gb.btmhs.icl.icl.poda      ICL
  gb.gold-400.hmg
  gb.gold-400.mitsy          IDEM
  gb.btmhs.itl.itl           ITL
  gb.gold-400.rml.nsd        Racal
de.dbp.nixdorf.nme
de.dbp.siemens-ag.ap11    Deutsche Forshungsnetz, F.R. Germany

Again, information on how to obtain a fuller list  is  given
below.

In addition the mail can be sent to  UK.AC.EAN-RELAY,  which
will  re-route  it  to  UK.AC.MHS-RELAY.  Though this is not
really recommended due to the inefficiency involved.

The gateway accepts the addresses in  either  the  UK  style
ordering,  shown  above,  or  its  inverse;  though UK style
ordering is recommended.

7.2.1 Examples

Address as given by
remote correspondent           who to mail

TEST1@gb.gold-400.hmg.mi5      TEST1%gb.gold-400.hmg.mi5@uk.ac.mhs-relay

jaques@emu.gipsi.aristote.fr   jaques%fr.aristote.gipsi.emu@uk.ac.mhs-relay

7.2.2 Gold-400 and Wider X.400 mailing

Beware the information in this section is not documented  in
the  advertised files available from UK.AC.UCL.CS, so is not
as reliable as the information above.

The list of places one can mail on Gold-400  is  wider  than
given  in  the  x400.sites list mentioned below. For example
mail to:

     gb.gold-400.digital

works  (and   I've   also   seen   it   used   as   gb.gold-
400.digital.digital).   Here  the  person  is  identified by
given name, dot, surname.

E.g. joe.bloggs%gb.gold-400.digital@uk.ac.mhs-relay

Other site not in x400.sites, but apparently accessible are:

     gb.gold-400.btrl.btrl
     gb.gold-400.dtied.ied.ied1

In addition it is possible to mail  a  wider  set  of  X.400
sites by following the information below.

X.400 address formats are different from those used on JANET
and it is important to find out the exact address parameters
to be used.

X.400 address fields are:

     Given name (givenname - not normally used)
     Initials (inits)
     Surname (surname)

     Organisation unit (orgunit)
     Organisation (org)
     Private management domain (prmd)
     Administrative domain (admd)
     Country (country)

It is more usual to use Initials and Surname to  identify  a
person,  though  there  are some instances of Given name and
Surname,  but  don't  use  both  Given  name  and  Initials.
Construct   a   localpart  to  be  either  inits.surname  or
occasionally givenname.surname.

All fields from country to organisation must be known but it
is  generally  not  required  to know the organisation unit,
unless there is likely to be confusion between names  within
the organisation.

The address to mail to is then

     localpart%country.admd.prmd.org.orgunit@uk.ac.mhs-relay

where .orgunit is omitted if organisation is not required.

An  alternative,  and  more   complex   form,   handled   by
UK.AC.MHS-RELAY  is  where  the  X.400 attributes of what it
calls the `MTS.ORAddress' are identfied by a  key,  this  is
followed  by  by  an  `=', then the value of that attribute.
Each key=value pair being separated by a `/'.   This  yields
addresses such as:

     /PN=Jean.Blanc/O=cie/PRMD=inria/ADMD=atlas/C=fr/

The  latest  proposals  for  these  forms  of  address   are
described in detail in RFC 1138 by Steve Kille of UCL.

Key=value pairs can be sent to UK.AC.MHS-RELAY in two forms.
One  is just as given, though one would normallly enclose it
in double quotes, or mailers may object to its illegality as

a  mailbox  name.   Double quotes can cause problems to some
systems the mail is sent from, see section 11.5

E.g. "/PN=Jean.Blanc/O=cie/PRMD=inria/ADMD=atlas/C=fr/"@uk.ac.mhs-
     relay

Another way is to extract the personal name components as  a
localpart  to  use  as  the  user,  use  the remainder as an
address to be relayed via UK.AC.MHS-RELAY

E.g. Jean.Blanc%"/O=cie/PRMD=inria/ADMD=atlas/C=fr/"@uk.ac.mhs-
     relay

The most common use of this form would be  if  one  receives
mail apparently from an address in this format. Constructing
one  by  hand  could  be  difficult.   However,  for   those
determined  to  try  it, the following attributes are common
and are identified by the key shown

            Attribute                       Key

            CountryName                     C
            AdministrationDomainName        ADMD
            PrivateDomainName               PRMD
            OrganizationName                OU
            OrganizationalUnitNames.value   O
            PersonalName                    PN
            PersonalName.surname            S
            PersonalName.given-name         G
            PersonalName.initials           I

7.2.3 Getting Mail Back

The simplest thing to do is just  quote  your  standard  NRS
format,  but  invert  the components to save upsetting those
who haven't come across the UK ordering before!

I.e. person@machine.place.ac.uk

If the remote correspondent is in an X.400 environment, then
your   address  in  an  X.400  style  may  be  of  use.  For
person@uk.ac.place.machine this is best quoted as:

           country         GB
           admd            GOLD 400
           prmd            UK.AC
           org             site
           orgunit         machine (if required)
           personal name   person

E.g. T.Clark@uk.ac.warwick is:

                  country         GB
                  admd            GOLD 400
                  prmd            UK.AC
                  org             warwick
                  personal name   T.Clark

whilst es412@uk.ac.camford.eng.mat is

                  country         GB
                  admd            GOLD 400
                  prmd            UK.AC
                  org             camford
                  orgunit         eng.mat
                  personal name   es412

7.2.4 Contacts and Information

The following documents were available from UK.AC.UCL.CS:

<DOCS>x400.usage   full details how to use the relay.
<DOCS>x400.sites   the list of sites handled.

They were obtained by doing an NIFTP to UK.AC.UCL.CS  giving
the  name  of  the  document  as  the FILENAME, guest as the
USERNAME and your mail address as the PASSWORD.

These files  were  very  much  out  of  date  in  March  90.
UK.AC.MHS-RELAY  will  be  taking  over,  but no details are
available yet on how to get information from  it.   It  will
probably be similar to UK.AC.EAN (see section 7.1.3 above).

Steve Kille's RFC 1138 on `Mapping Between X.400(1988) / ISO
10021  and  RFC  822'  can  be  obtained  by sending mail to
info-server@UK.AC.UCL.CS containing the message:

                       request: rfc
                       topic: rfc1138
                       request: end

For help and advice the contact is

     liaison@uk.ac.mhs-relay

7.2.5 Tried and Tested

As long as you are  attempting  to  mail  a  site  which  is
mentioned  in  <DOCS>x400.sites,  there  is  every chance of
success. If you are trying something more, perhaps following
the   advice   in  7.2.2  above,  then  things  are  not  so
predicatble.

One thing to beware of is that if the connection fails  from
Gold-400  to  the  distant  end  you will get a message back
saying, ``Unrecognised ORname'' (i.e. unknown  organisation)
rather  than  saying  there is a fault. This appears to be a
bug within Gold-400 and is  decidedly  unhelpful  until  you
learn to recognise it.

8. JUNET (JAPAN)

JUNET have a domain name of `jp', `jpn', or  `junet'.  JUNET
is  moving  over  to a secondary domain similar to that used
within JANET, and a top-level domain of `jp'. These are:

             .ac.jp%universities
             .co.jp%commercial organisations
             .go.jp%governmental institutes
             .or.jp%other organisations

Users on JUNET who are registered to  receive  mail  through
CSNET   may   be   reached   by  routing  the  mail  through
relay.cs.net (encountered in the CSNET  information  above).
Previously  the  domain  name `junet' had to be used, though
now relay.cs.net knows the domain name `jp' too.

E.g. sui%kddlab.kddlabs.junet%net.cs.relay@uk.ac.nsfnet-
     relay sui%kddlab.co.jp%net.cs.relay@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

Note that messages from/to CSNET have been  charged  to  the
JUNET  users  since  Oct.  1, 1987 and so only mail to users
registered to receive it via this route will work.

If a JUNET user wishes to use the CSNET-JUNET  link,  he/she
has   to   send   an  application  to  the  VAX8600  machine
(tansei.cc.u-tokyo.junet) in  the  office  of  the  Computer
Centre, University of Tokyo, get the account on the machine,
then  execute the `csnet' command or generate a  message  to
csnet-account@u-tokyo.junet   in   order   to  register  the
addresses using the account.

The general method though is to treat JUNET addresses in the
same  way  as  UUCP  addresses  and send them via UK.AC.UKC,
which knows about all three forms of the  domain  name  (jp,
jpn and junet). See section 5 above.

Kyoto University is on BITNET, and now uses addresses of the
form  machine.kyoto-u.ac.jp,  so  any addresses of this form
are best handled by the EARN-RELAY.

If your site doesn't subscribe to UKC, and  the  JUNET  user
doesn't subscribe to CSNET, then things get a little tricky.
The  EARN  route  to  mcvax,  and  the  Internet  route   to
uunet.uu.net would seem worth trying. However, mcvax doesn't
know about the domains `jp' and `jpn'. On  the  other  hand,
EARN-RELAY   knows  about  `jp',  so  that's  worth  a  try,
especially if the address ends `.ac.jp'.

I suspect mail can  find  its  way  via  UK.AC.NSFNET-RELAY,
without  the  need for mentioning another relay. However, as
this may take the route via  net.cs.relay,  (for  which  the

recipient  needs  to  be  registered)  this is probably best
avoided.

8.1 Examples

Address as given by
remote correspondent       who to mail

kimio@aoba.tohoki.junet    kimio%junet.tohoki.aoba@uk.ac.ukc
                      or   kimio%aoba.tohoki.junet%net.uu.uunet@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

suo@titcca.cc.titeck.jpn   suo%titcca.cc.titeck.jpn@uk.ac.ukc
                      or   suo%titcca.cc.titeck.jpn%net.uu.uunet@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

li@tokyo.ac.jp             li%jp.ac.tokyo@uk.ac.ukc
                      or   li%tokyo.ac.jp%net.uu.uunet@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
                      or   li%jp.ac.tokyo@uk.ac.earn-relay

8.2 Getting Mail back

The best way to quote your address is in the

     person@machine.place.ac.uk

format, though the correspondent in Japan will probably have
to use something like:

     person%machine.place.ac.uk@bitnet-relay

8.3 Tried and Tested

The route out via either  UKC  or  relay.cs.net  (for  those
sites  in  CSNET) is reliable. The route via uunet.uu.net is
questionable. The information about the BITNET link  is  the
newest, and therefore untried.

8.4 Contact

There is a network administrator who may be reached as

     junet-admin%junet%net.cs.relay@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

     The CSNET-JUNET gateway administration office is

     csnet-admin%u-tokyo.junet%net.cs.relay@uk.ac.nsfnet-
     relay

9. MISCELLANEOUS OTHER NETWORKS

9.1 MAILNET

A long dead network which lingers in name  only.  EARN-RELAY
gateway  knows  about  this,  so  route  it  via there. Most
MAILNET sites are now on BITNET or Internet,  so  make  sure
the  remote  correspondent  knows  your  EARN/BITNET  return
address or your Internet return address  (See  Internet  and
EARN/BITNET sections above).

E.g. sue%mailnet.osye@uk.ac.earn-relay

9.2 INFNET or IT.INFN - ITALY

This has undergone a few changes. A number of sites used  to
be  linked  directly  into  EARN  and so could be handled as
described in section 3.  There is a migration to the form of
address  site.infn.it. Where possible it is best to find the
new name and make use of it as described below.

There was an intermediate stage where sites were reached via
EARN  and known as site.infnet. If you have such an address,
replace the infnet by infn.it.  Once  you  have  an  address
ending  `.infn.it',  then  EARN-RELAY  will  cope with it as
follows. Use:

     userid%it.infn.site@uk.ac.earn-relay

For reply, quote your EARN reply address.

9.3 TUAI - NEW ZEALAND

Some sites in  New  Zealand  run  Grey  Book  mail  and  are
contactable   via   PSS.   If  the  site's  PSS  address  is
registered, in NIFTP-MAIL context in the  NRS,  then  it  is
possible  to  route  the  mail  via  UK.AC.EAN-RELAY,  which
handles Grey Book mail between the UK and New  Zealand.  The
addresses   concerned   are   mostly  `nz.ac.'  with  a  few
`nz.govt'.

E.g. psyabcd%nz.ac.otago@uk.ac.ean-relay

However, there is a move away from  Grey  Book  to  Internet
protocols,  and  the  best  route  for reaching sites in New
Zealand is now via the Internet.

E.g. psyabcd%nz.ac.otago@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

Previously recommended routes via Munnari (at the University
of  Melbourne  in  Australia)  and  via relay.cs.net are not
likely to work where the Internet route fails.

9.4 ACSNET and CSIRONET - AUSTRALIA

The Australian Computer Science  Network,  which  relies  in
part on the government funded CSIRONET.

The gateway machine, Munnari at Melbourne University  is  an
EAN  participant,  and  is  addressed as munnari.mu.au.  The
rest have names ending either just, `.oz' or `.oz.au'. If it
does  end `.oz.au', then you may need to strip off the `.au'
then route it via EAN-RELAY  (see  section  7  above).  That
relay  knows to route the mail via Munnari.  It may be worth
checking that the site is in the file oz.sites mentioned  in
that section.

Although `.oz' is strictly a sub-domain of `.au', there used
to  be  a  problem adding the missing `.au'; I'm not sure if
it's fixed yet.  So it's best not to use `.au'  after  `.oz'
in an address.

 Address as given by
 remote correspondent    who to mail

 bsm@cascade.trl.oz.au   bsm%oz.trl.cascade@uk.ac.ean-relay

 jtbg@ditmelb.oz         jtbg%oz.ditmelb@uk.ac.ean-relay

The same sites can also be reached via UKC and NSFNET-RELAY,
though  there  seems  little  point in sending the mail that
way.

Some sites on ACSNET and CSIRONET can  also  be  reached  by
Grey  Book  mail  over the Public Packet Switch Data Network
(PSS in the UK) directly; see section 10 below.

Mail coming back to the UK is best routed via munnari.mu.au,

I.e. person%machine.place.ac.uk@munnari.mu.au

9.5 HEANET - EIRE

The Irish national academic network. Addresses used to  look
like:

     person@irl.hean.place.machine

but now are more commonly specified as:

     person@machine.place.ie

If the address is in the older format,  convert  it  to  the
newer, and route via the EARN-RELAY.

 Address as given by
 remote correspondent    who to mail

 leary@vax1.rcd.ie       leary%ie.rcd.vax1@uk.ac.earn-relay

 sean@irl.hean.ucc.cms   ie.ucc.cms@uk.ac.earn-relay

A list of sites is held on UK.AC.JANET.NEWS in  HEANET.  For
replies just quote your JANET address in the order:

     person@machine.place.ac.uk

Although some machines at University College Dublin (ucd.ie)
appear  in the EAN list, this is little used, and the use of
the EARN-RELAY is recommended instead.

Uucp is also used as a means of connection to  Eire,  but  I
don't  know if that can reach places which EARN-RELAY can't.
As a desparate last measure consider:

     person%machine.place.ie@uk.ac.ukc

9.6 SDN - KOREA

This is a network in South Korea. The domain name  is  `kr',
and  mail  should  be  routed  as  for  either UUCP or CSNET
addresses. Note that some sites with  the  domain  `kr'  are
reached via the EAN-RELAY (see section 7).

9.7 SPAN - SPACE PHYSICS

The Space Physics  Analysis  Network.  The  domain  name  is
`.SPAN'  and  there  is  now  a  relay  in  the  UK,  called
UK.AC.SPAN-RELAY, which handles this traffic.

SPAN users usually identify themselves by node and user.  To
send to such a person, use:

     "node::user"@UK.AC.SPAN-RELAY

Double quotes can cause problems to some systems the mail is
sent from, see section 11.5

The following routes are now hopefully redundant:

     user%node.SPAN%edu.stanford.star@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
     user%node.SPAN%gov.nasa.jpl.vlsi@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
     user%node.SPAN%gov.nasa.arc.ames@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
     user%node.SPAN%bitnet.sdsc@uk.ac.earn-relay
     person%gov.nasa.span.site%uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

To get a reply to someone on JANET the SPAN user should send
the mail to

     RLESIS::CBS%uk.ac.site.machine::person

For further information contact Postmaster@UK.AC.SPAN-RELAY

9.8 Easynet - DEC

This is DEC's internal network. Addresses tend to be of  the
form

     host::user

But beware, just because you see an  address  in  this  form
don't  assume  it's  on Easynet - the same format is used on
numerous other Decnets. `Decnet' is not a single network, it
is  the  name of a proprietary protocol for linking together
DEC machines.

Provided the host is on Easynet, route the mail as follows:

     user%host.dec%com.dec.decwrl@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

If you are mailing to someone in DEC UK, it's better to make
use of X.400, see section 7.2.

Give your Internet address as the reply address.

9.9 Xerox Grapevine

Also known as the Xerox RIN (Research  INternet).  Addresses
on this network are given as:

     person.registry

and the mail should be routed as follows:

     person.registry%com.xerox@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

Give your Internet address as the reply address.

9.10 VNET - IBM

This is IBM's internal network.  It is not possible to  mail
users  on  VNET  hosts in general. You can only send mail to
IBM VNET users who are registered to receive external mail -
they  will  have  a unique username on VNET, which is linked
EARN/BITNET. Send the mail to:

     username%vnet@uk.ac.earn-relay

9.11 HARNET - HONG KONG

This is the Hong Kong part of  the  UUCP  network.  However,
only  the  gateway machine, hkucs, is in the UUCP site maps.
Therefore to reach other machines on this network such as:

     cpccvx, hkucc, hkueee, encvax,  hkpv07,  cucsc,  bc750,
     hkpv03, hkpv06, hkpv08, cucsd, cuele, bc785a, bc785b

route the call via hkucs.uucp. I.e.:

     person%site%hkucs.uucp@uk.ac.ukc

or

     person%site%hkucs.uucp%net.uu.uunet@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

9.12 CANET - CHINA

A network gatewayed via the University of Kalsrhue  in  West
Germany and thence to Beijing. In general you should be able
to reach a user in China using the address:

     user%beijing%ira.uka.de%net.cs.relay@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

or perhaps:

     user%beijing%de.uka.ira@uk.ac.earn-relay

There are more than 30 member institutions of CANET. several
institutions use a personal computer and a modem to login on
an account at the host Beijing to read and post  mail.  That
is why the site is not identified in the address.

The following points have been made:

     Please don't send tons of  information  to  China.  The
     link is slow and both ends pay dearly for each byte.

     Please avoid sending political statements.  This  could
     do more harm than use.

The postmaster at Beijing is called `mail' not `postmaster'.

CANET is not related  to  the  CHINANET-BITNET  project  (of
which I have no information apart from this sentence).

9.13 BT Telecom Gold and Gold-400

British Telecom have been completely unable  to  link  their
Gold  `network' into electronic mail in general. Gold is not
in reality a network at all, but a collection of machines on
which  users are given an account. They then have to connect
to that machine to send and receive mail. Although mail  can
be  passed  amongst  the  individual  machines,  and to some
others running the same sort of  system,  Gold  provides  no
interface to the electronic mail network.  Fortunately there
is a means of making contact though.

Work was underway at British Telecom to  connect  Gold  into

the electronic mail network by means of X.400. However, they
appear to have admitted defeat  and  the  service  is  split
between  Gold  and  Gold-400. Most Telecom Gold users are on
the former.  The Gold 400 service  is  based  on  X.400  and
accessible   via  UK.AC.MHS-RELAY.   This  is  described  in
section 7 above.

9.13.1 Telecom Gold

All is not lost for those trying to  mail  people  on  plain
`Gold'.   Accounts  on  Gold  are  composed of two important
components.  The first two digits form  the  system  number.
This  is  the  identity of the machine the user's account is
held on, values seem to be in the range 72 to 84  inclusive.
The  remainder is the account, and consists of three letters
then three or four digits.

E.g. 83LLX1062

Due to work by the Commercial Mail relay  Project  (CMR)  at
USC's  Information  Sciences  Institute  in  the  USA,  (see
section 9.15), there is  a  route  to  Gold.  The  class  of
service  which Gold fits into is called `DIALCOM' by CMR. On
this system users are identfied by a domain number  (one  to
three  digits),  which  for Gold (and a couple of others) is
100. This is then followed by a two digit system number, for
which  CMR  say  Gold has the range 01,04,17,80-89.  This is
followed by a colon  and  then  the  account  number.  Don't
despair  if  you  are faced with a system number outside the
range given by CMR; it does work for others, e.g. 79.

For the above Gold example of 83LLX1062, this translates  to
a CMR DIALCOM address of:

     10083:LLX1062

There are then two possible starting points for  experiment.
The first is simply to try:

     "domain  system:account"%telemail%isi.edu@uk.ac.nsfnet-
     relay

E.g. for account 83LLX1062 one might try:

     "10083:LLX1062"%telemail%edu.isi@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

Double quotes can cause problems to some systems the mail is
sent from, see section 11.5

Tests with addresses such as  those  have  not  yet  worked,
however  there  is  an  alternative,  though more messy way,
which does work.  That is to send some mail to:

     intermail%edu.isi.intermail@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

with the first two lines of the body of the mail  (i.e.  the
text of the message itself, not the header) containing:

     Forward: COMPMAIL
     To: domain system:account

E.g. Forward: COMPMAIL
     To: 10083:LLX1062

9.14 TTNS - The Times Network for Schools

This uses Telecom Gold,  and  so  the  method  described  in
9.13.1  above  should  work.   I  believe it uses the system
number 01.

9.15 Commercial Mail Relay - Intermail

In 1988, the Commercial Mail Relay (CMR)  was  developed  at
the USC Information Sciences Institute to run on a dedicated
UNIX system, replacing the TOPS-20 based  Intermail  system.
The  Commercial  Mail  Relay service currently provides mail
relay service between  the  Internet  and  three  commercial
electronic  mail  systems:  US Sprint/Telenet, MCI-Mail, and
DIALCOM systems (IEEECompmail, NSFMAIL, and USDA-MAIL).

Once a person is a user of one of  these  systems  they  may
exchange  electronic mail with users on the Internet via the
Commercial Mail Relay service.

The only requirement for using this mail gateway is that the
work  conducted  must  be DARPA sponsored research and other
approved government business.

While CMR has the technical capability to  interconnect  any
two  mail systems, their policy requires at least one end of
the communication to be DARPA related.   They  cannot  allow
DARPA  facilities  to be used simply as a bridge between two
commercial systems.

9.15.1 Direct Addressing

In order for a message to be delivered from ARPA-Mail  to  a
mailbox  on  a  Telemail system you simply type the Telemail
mailbox in the ARPA- Internet header.

I.e. user-mailbox%TELEMAIL%edu.isi@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

The major effort is in deciding what the user-mailbox is. If
it  includes any characters which are not legal in a mailbox
name, (e.g. / [ ] : ), then  this  must  be  put  in  double
quotes.   Double  quotes  can cause problems to some systems
the mail is sent from, see section 11.5

For systems in the Telemail group of systems the format of a

user-mailbox is:

     [user/org]sysbranch/country

Where sysbranch/country is one of:

   TELEMAIL/USA          NASAMAIL/USA      MAIL/USA
   TELEMEMO/AUSTRALIA    TELECOM/CANADA    TOMMAIL/CHILE
   TMAILUK/GB            ITALMAIL/ITALY    ATI/JAPAN
   PIPMAIL/ROC           DGC/USA           FAAMAIL/USA
   GSFC/USA              GTEMAIL/USA       TM11/USA
   TNET.TELEMAIL/USA     USDA/USA          TBXSPA/SWEDEN
   CORREO.PEMEX/MEXICO   PIPMAIL1/TAIWAN

So to  mail  to  JBloggs/Acme  on  the  TMAILUK  network  in
Britain, one would use:

     "[JBloggs/Acme]TMAILUK/GB"%TELEMAIL%edu.isi@uk.ac.nsfnet-
     relay

OMNET's  Sciencenet  is  on  the  telenet  system  MAIL/USA.
Listed below are some subdivisions CMR mail to:

          AIR     Atmospheric Sciences
          EARTH   Solid Earth Sciences
          LIFE    Life Sciences
          OCEAN   Ocean Sciences
          POLAR   Interdisciplinary Polar Studies
          SPACE   Space Science and Remote Sensing

A typical user-mailbox of someone on OMNET would be  in  the
form:

     [username/omnet]mail/usa

Note that Telemail can  also  be  reached  as  described  in
section 9.16 below.

For other systems handled by CMR the user-mailbox is of  the
form indicated by the following examples:

MCIMAIL: (see also section 9.17 below)
    123-4567       seven digit address
    John Smith     person's name (must be unique)

COMPMAIL:
NSFMAIL:
USDAMAIL:
    CMP0123        three letters, followed by three or four digits
    J.Smith        initial . last name
    157:CMP0123    system number : account name

DIALCOM:

    6007:AUS0123   domain and system numbers : account name

For COMPMAIL the system number is 134 and for  both  NSFMAIL
and  USDAMAIL  it  is  157.  For DIALCOM related systems the
domain is a one to three digit number and the  system  is  a
two digit number as per the following table:

Service Name      Country       DOMAIN   SYSTEM

Keylink-Dialcom   Australia     60       07,08,09
Dialcom           Canada        20       20,21,22,23,24
DPT-Databoks      Denmark       124      71
Telebox           Finland       127      62
Telebox           Germany       30       15,16
Dialcom           Hong Kong     80       88,89
Eirmail           Ireland       100      74
Goldnet           Israel        50       05,06
Mastermail        Italy         130      65,67
Mastermail        Italy         1        66,68
Dialcom           Japan         70       13,14
Dialcom           Korea         1        52
Telecom-Gold      Malta         100      75
Dialcom           Mexico        1        52
Memocom           Netherlands   124      27,28,29
Memocom           Netherlands   1        55
Starnet           New Zealand   64       01,02
Dialcom           Puerto Rico   58       25
Telebox           Singapore     88       10,11,12
Dialcom           Taiwan        1        52
Telecom-Gold      UK            100      01,04,17,80-89
DIALCOM           USA           1        29,30,31,32,33,34,37,38,41,42,
                                         43,44,45,46,47,48,49,50-59,61,
                                         62,63,90-99

Unfortunately it's not quite clear  what  the  name  of  the
relay  one  mails  to  at  isc.edu  is. The documentation is
unclear in this area. Although  it  implies  TELEMAIL,  this
would  seem  to cause a clash (it would be unable to resolve
accounts given by name to COMPMAIL, USDAMAIL or NSFMAIL).  I
suspect,   therefore,   that  one  either  has  to  use  the
domain/system number method in full, or,  more  likely,  one
can  only  send  mail  to  such  systems  by  embedding  the
addresses in the mail as described later on.

Examples (very doubtful)

To mail account number 123-4567 on MCIMAIL use:

     123-4567%TELEMAIL%edu.isi@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

To mail account CMP0123 on COMPMAIL

     134:CMP0123%TELEMAIL%edu.isi@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

To mail account AGS0123 on USDAMAIL use:

     157:AGS0123%TELEMAIL%edu.isi@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

To mail account KBH0123 on DPT Databoks in Denmark use:

     12471:KBH0123%TELEMAIL%edu.isi@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

9.15.2 Addresses Embedded in The Mail

The alternative method is to put the address in the body  of
the  message  itself, as the first two lines of the message,
and then send the mail to:

     intermail%edu.isi.intermail@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

The first two lines of the text of the message should be:

     Forward: system name
     To: user-mailbox

Where system name is one of:  TELEMAIL,  MCIMAIL,  COMPMAIL,
NSFMAIL   or   USDAMAIL.  For  systems  on  DIALCOM  related
networks, one uses `COMPMAIL'.

Using the same examples as used above:

To mail to JBloggs/Acme on the TMAILUK network  in  Britain,
make the first two lines of the text of the message:

     Forward: TELEMAIL
     To: [JBloggs/Acme]TMAILUK/GB

and  send  it  to  intermail%edu.isi.intermail@uk.ac.nsfnet-
relay.

To mail account number 123-4567 on MCIMAIL, make  the  first
two lines of the text of the message:

     Forward: MCIMAIL
     To: 123-4567

and  send  it  to  intermail%edu.isi.intermail@uk.ac.nsfnet-
relay.

To mail account KBH0123 on DPT Databoks in Denmark, make the
first two lines of the text of the message:

     Forward: COMPMAIL
     To: 12471:KBH0123

and  send  it  to  intermail%edu.isi.intermail@uk.ac.nsfnet-

relay.

This is the method that it is used to contact  Telecom  Gold
users (see 9.13 above).

9.15.3 Getting Mail Back

To get the mail back to JANET: the users of  these  services
have  to construct an item of mail where the first two lines
contain:

     Forward: ARPA
     TO: person@machine.place.AC.UK

and leave the third line blank.

E.g. Forward: ARPA
     TO: T.Clark@Warwick.AC.UK

This item of mail must be dispatched to the  CMR  which  has
mailboxes on various commercial mail systems as follows:

         Telemail:  [Intermail/USCISI]TELEMAIL/USA
         MCI-Mail:  Intermail     or     107-8239
         CompMail:  Intermail     or     CMP0817
         NSF-Mail:  Intermail     or     NSF153
         USDA-Mail:  Intermail     or     AGS9999

On other DIALCOM systems which need a domain/system  number,
it's probably worth trying:

     134:CMP0817 or 157:NSF153 or 157:AGS9999

9.15.4 Further Information

For more information send a message  to  NETSERV@UK.AC.EARN-
RELAY containing the text GET A01APR14 HELPNEWS.

For   further   help   and   advice,   contact    Intermail-
Request%edu.isi.intermail@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay.

9.16 Telemail

Telemail can be accessed as just described in  section  9.15
above, or as:

     id%TELEMAIL%gov.nasa.arc.orion@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

It is unclear whether the id is only the short form:

     JBloggs/Acme

(which would imply TELEMAIL/USA) or whether  it  allows  the
use  of other Telemail systems by using the fuller form such

as:

     [JSmith/Ford]ITALMAIL/ITALY

9.17 MCIMAIL

Although the CMR relay described in 9.15 above  can  perform
this  task,  a better way to send mail to a user of MCI MAIL
is simply to mail it to:

     id%com.mcimail@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

Where id is three digits, hyphen, four digits.

E.g. 123-4567%com.mcimail@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

For users with unique names the id can be  their  name,  but
with any spaces replaced by underscores.

E.g. Alfred_Scholl%com.mcimail@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

E.g. VHalkett%com.mcimail@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

To get mail from MCIMAIL to JANET the MCIMAIL user  responds
`INTERNET'  when  promted  for `EMS:' and the standard Rest-
of-the-World     form     of     the      address      (i.e.
person@machine.place.AC.UK) when prompted for `MBX:'.

9.18 FIDO NET

FIDONET is a network of PC systems which exchange  mail  via
dialup  connections.  Mail  can be sent from the Internet to
users  on  these  systems;  their  addresses  will  end   in
".fidonet.org".  Sometimes you may receive a FIDONET address
in a numerical address notation. A complete address such  as
`1:105/4.0'     translates     to     the     domain    name
`p0.f4.n105.z1.fidonet.org'.  The  leading  `1:'   and   the
trailing `.0' are defaults, and are sometimes omitted; thus,
`1:105/4' or `105/4' is the same address. The components  of
the  numerical  address  are called the Zone, Net, FidoNode,
and Point, respectively. The numbers are  preceded  by  `z',
`n',  `f',  and  `p',  followed  by periods, concatenated in
reverse order, and suffixed by `fidonet.org' to produce  the
complete  host  name.  Usernames  are  typically of the form
`Firstname_Lastname'.

The Internet address should then be inverted to UK  ordering
before  forwarding  it  via  UK.AC.NSFNET-RELAY.   Thus  the
Fidonet address `Jerry Frophaus of 129/37' can be translated
into the address

     Jerry_Frophaus%org.fidonet.z1.n129.f37.p0@uk.ac.nsfnet-
     relay

Conversely, to send a message from Fidonet to JANET, address
the  message to user UUCP on the nearest Fido-Net node which
forwards mail to UUCP.  (When the new nodelist flags are  in
place and widely used, the Fido user won't need to know what
the nearest Fido-Net  forwarding  node  is.)  Fido-Net  node
1:105/6 is a node which forwards mail to UUCP.

The first line of the message should contain:

     To: person@machine.place.AC.UK

For more information send a message  to  NETSERV@UK.AC.EARN-
RELAY containing the text GET A01SEP19 HELPNEWS.

9.19 APPLE LINK

This is Apple Computer Inc.'s in-house network.  To  mail  a
user on this use:

     user%com.apple.applelink@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

9.20 COMPUSERVE

Members  of  the  CompuServe  Information  Service  have  an
address  (also  known  as User ID) which consists of number,
comma, number.  E.g. 70000,11. Change the comma to a dot and
send it to compuserv.com as explained in section 4.

E.g. 70000.11%com.compuserve@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

Members of organisations with a private CompuServe Mail area
have  an  address  of  the  form  organisation:name, such as
`ABC:J.SMITH'.  To send mail to such  an  address  from  the
JANET, send it to:

     name%com.compuserv.organisation@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

E.g. J.SMITH%com.compuserv.ABC@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

A few organisations  have  adresses  which  also  include  a
department in the form organisation:department:name, such as
`ABC:ACCTG:JOHN'.  To send mail  to  such  an  address  from
JANET, send it to

     name%com.compuserv.organisaion.department@uk.ac.nsfnet-
     relay

E.g. JOHN%com.compuserv.ABC.ACCTG@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

There are also a number of special destinations available to
users  of  CompuServe  Mail  which  are  NOT accessible from
outside, including:

          Facsimilie Delivery   (e.g. >FAX: )

          Postal Delivery       (e.g. >POSTAL: )
          Telex Delivery        (e.g. >TLX: )
          MCI Mail Delivery     (e.g. >MCIMAIL: )

For mail to MCI refer to section 9.17 above.

CompuServe  subscribers  can  reach  people  on  JANET  from
CompuServe's mailers via the specification:

     >internet:person@machine.place.ac.uk

The use of  `>network:'  is  CompuServe's  general  gateway-
access  syntax;  it  does  not  appear  in  anything  on the
Internet side  of  the  gateway,  and  proper  RFC-compliant
headers are generated.

9.21 INDIA

Apart from the Tata Institute which has two nodes on  BITNET
(TATAVAX  and  TIFRVAX,  reached as explained in section 3),
the majority of reachable sites in India  are  accessed  via
UUCP.  However,  it appears that the only site registered in
the maps is shakti. To reach other  sites  one  has  to  use
addresses  with  `!'  s in them from shatki, as explained in
section 5 above.

For more information send a message  to  NETSERV@UK.AC.EARN-
RELAY containing the text GET A01MAY26 HELPNEWS.

9.22 MICROLINK

This is part of TMAILUK and can be  reached  by  X.400  (see
section 7.2 for more details of X.400 relaying).

Microlink mailboxes consist of the letters MAG  followed  by
between three and six digits.

E.g. MAG900665

Mail from JANET to Microlink should go  via  UK.AC.MHS-RELAY
as follows:

      "/dd.un=mailbox_number/"%gb.tmailuk.microlink@uk.ac.mhs-
     relay

E.g.     "/dd.un=MAG900665/"%gb.tmailuk.microlink@uk.ac.mhs-
     relay

Double quotes can cause problems to some systems the mail is
sent from, see section 11.5

Getting mail back from Microlink  is  horrendously  complex,
the recipient should be entered as:

     (C:GB,PUB:GOLD 400,PVT:uk.ac,O:place,SN:user,OU:machine)

NB:  a space MUST be included in `GOLD 400'.  The OU:machine
can be left out if not used.

E.g. (C:GB,PUB:GOLD 400,PVT:uk.ac,O:warwick,SN:T.Clark)

Refering to section 7.2 it will be seen that the `C',  `PUB'
etc.  components  are  Microlink's  way  of representing the
X.400 attributes.

Microlink allows use of so-called Nicknames, and  again  the
process is complex. It is as follows

     At the prompt            Enter

     Command?                 Nickname
     (Menu)                   ADD
     (Menu)                   X4
     Enter nickname           the nickname required
     Country name             GB
     Public system            gold 400    [Note space]
     Private system           uk.ac
     (Menu)                   NAM
     Last name                person
     Generational Qualifier   n
     First name               press return
     Middle initial           n
     Organisation Name        place
     Organisation Unit(s):
     :                        machine
     :                        press return
     DDAs                     press return

This will generate an address of the form (and in the order)
shown above.

9.23 Miscellaneous: ATT, BIX, BMUG, Connect, Geonet, Mfenet,
NASAMail, Sinet

These are  a  variety  of  networks  for  which  I  have  no
information  other  than  brief details on how to mail them.
The details are given in the table below.

network    address given       address to mail

ATT        user                user%attmail%com.att@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
BIX        user                user%net.das.dcibix@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
BMUG       Name Surname        Name.Surname%org.fidonet.bmug@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
CONNECT    NAME                NAME%net.das.dcjcon@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
GEONET     user@host           user%net.das.host@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
MFENET     user@mfenode        user%mfenet.mfenode.%@uk.ac.earn-relay
NASAMAIL   user                user%gov.nasa.nasamail@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
SINET      node::user          user%com.slb.sinet.node@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

           node1::node::user   user%node%com.slb.sinet.node1@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

Mail     is     sent     back     to      JANET      address
person@uk.ac.place.machine as follows:

From CONNECT
     Send to CONNECT id `DASNET'  with  the  first  line  of
     message:
     "person%machine.place.ac.uk"@DASNET

From NASAMAIL

     Send to POSTMAN with the first line of the message:
     To: person@machine.place.ac.uk

From SINET
     Send                                                 to
     M_MAILNOW::M_INTERNET::"person@machine.place.ac.uk"
     or M_MAILNOW::M_INTERNET::machine.place.ac.uk::user

9.24 Elsewhere

If you've read  through  all  sections  above,  then  you've
probably  gained  enough  information to make an intelligent
stab at networks not mentioned. Faced with an  address  like
Bloggs@somwhere.wierdonet  the basic idea is to try and pass
the buck of deciding what to do with it  to  a  place  where
there  are  experts who spend a lot of time sorting out mail
routing problems, and hopefully have that network  in  their
routing tables. So initial stabs may be:

     Bloggs%wierdonet.somewhere@uk.ac.earn-relay

or   Bloggs%wierdonet.somewhere@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay

or   Bloggs%wierdonet.somewhere@uk.ac.ukc

Certainly the EARN-RELAY knows about the  following  domains
(or sub-domains) that are not mentioned elsewhere:

     .una.at, .chunet, .guelph, .hepnet, .il, .is,  .cnr.it,
     .no, .ac.sg, .utoronto, .weslyn, .wustl

Don't assume you can relay via any arbitrary  site.  A  site
must  have  relaying  capabilities. Although most UUCP sites
can relay, most BITNET/EARN ones can not.

A little trick which may be of use to those trying  to  send
mail    to    the    CERN    DECNET    (with    names   like
place.decnet.cern.ch). If it gets rejected because the place
is unknown, and you know its DECNET hostnumber then

     User%ch.cern.decnet.hostnumber@uk.ac.earn-relay

may well work.

10. GREY BOOK ABROAD

Some sites abroad use the Coloured Book protocols,  and  are
accessible  via PSS (IPSS) using Grey Book over NIFTP. There
are sites running Coloured Book software in, Australia,  New
Zealand, Ireland, parts of Scandinavia, and some High Energy
Physicists worldwide. Note that New Zealand  sites  will  be
moving away from use of these protocols.

A number of sites in Australia  are  currently  running  the
Colour  book  software.  There  is an initiative - Spearnet,
South Pacific Educational and Research Network,  which  will
initially  be using this suite of protocols but migrating to
others.

Some examples are:

NZ.AC.LINCOLN      Lincoln College, New Zealand (VAX/VMS)
NZ.AC.MASSEY       Massey University Computer Centre, New Zealand (Pr1me)
NZ.AC.WAIKATO      University of Waikato, New Zealand (VAX/VMS)
NZ.GOVT.DSIR       Dept. of Scientific & Industrial Research, Div. of
                   Information Technology, VMS
AU.AUSTEK          AUSTEK VLSI Design, Adelaide, Australia (VAX/VMS)
AU.DITSYDA         CSIRO Sydney; Gould UTX
RPEPPING           CSIRO Division of Radio Physics, Australia (VAX/VMS)
AU.CSIRO.DITMELB   CSIRO Division of Information Technology (Melbourne) -
                   MicroVAX II

and all of the HEANET sites mentioned in JANET.NEWS (see 9.5
above)

The main problem that JANET  users  have  to  face  here  is
getting Grey Book mailers to make the call incorporating the
authorisation in the YBTS address,  in  order  to  negotiate
through  the JANET/PSS gateway. It's usually the fastest way
to reach such sites if you can get it to work though.

Information on the JANET/PSS gateway is held  on  the  JANET
NEWS machine (make an interactive call to UK.AC.JANET.NEWS).

11. VARIOUS PROBLEMS

11.1 Case translation

UK.AC.EARN-RELAY translates all mailbox addresses  to  upper
case.  This  prevents  mail  getting  through to users whose
username is lower or mixed  case,  and  the  target  machine
insists on the username being in the correct case.

The same is usually true if mail goes over  EARN/BITNET  for
any  other  reason.  So  if  a  username or sitename is only
recognizable in mixed or  lower  case,  you  have  to  avoid
EARN/BITNET.

11.2 Line truncation

Many BITNET/EARN machines truncate or fold lines longer than
80  characters.   This  can  be  a problem for address lines
which must be on one line. The address may start as a modest
30 characters or so, but by the time mailers and relays have
been to work on it it's surprising how  long  the  addresses
can  get.  The truncation or folding of an address line then
has a fatal affect on the mail.   The  culprits  are  almost
invariably  IBM  machines which hanker after the old days of
80 column punched cards.

11.3 Character translation

Going via relays may involve your mail in  being  translated
from  one character code to another. Even if the mail starts
and ends in the same code, the fact that it has been through
translation  to another, then through an inverse translation
which  is  not  an  exact  inverse,  causes  alterations  of
characters.    This   is  not  usually  a  problem  for  the
characters used within mail names and  addresses.  It  would
only show up if someone's mail name had an unusual character
in it.

11.4 Alteration of the Contents

All of the above changes can alter the contents  of  a  mail
item.  Apart  from  truncation, this is within the bounds of
what a mail service is there to provide.  If  you're  trying
to  use  mail as a file transfer mechanism, then you need to
adopt an encoding which will survive these changes. Some  of
the encodings actually in use are not really sufficient. For
an encoding to work over all  possible  networks  it  should
really  only  use  letters  (regarding  upper  and  lower as
equivalent) and digits and be prepared for white space to be
altered  to  other  white  space (E.g. several spaces, a new
line, and several more spaces might become a new line and  a
tab).  Few encodings meet such standards.

11.5 Characters trapped by the  local  mailer  or  Operating
System

Mail  addresses  can  use  a  wide  range   of   punctuation
characters.  Sometimes  when  an  address  is  typed in to a
particular operating system, by the user sending  the  mail,
the  operating  system  will  take special action on some of
these characters, and not pass them to the mailer as  typed.
Double quotes often cause problems.

The problems which occur when double quotes are removed from
an  address are sometimes difficult to diagnose. Although it
may render the address technically illegal according to  RFC
822,  the  sending mailer may cope with it. It may then be a
relay mailer which objects to the illegal address.

Problems may also occur inside the mailer itself. Many  Unix
mailers  are  unable to pass double quotes in mail addresses
(even having overcome the  problem  of  getting  the  double
quotes past the shell).

11.6 Mail Just Disappears

This is one of the most frustrating problems to track  down.
It doesn't harm to state the obvious: just because you don't
get a reply to some mail, you can't assume  that  your  mail
didn't get through - it may be the reply which has got lost.
In such circumstances a phone call is often the easiest  way
of determining what got lost.

Sometimes the mail will arrive eventually, it may  get  held
up  due  to a machine in the route being out of action for a
while, or a backlog building up on a  machine  in  a  store-
and-forward mail network like EARN or UUCP.

11.7 Indecipherable Mail Addressee

There are two main problems here. The first is that  a  mail
address  is  not  given  fully.  For  both  domain  oriented
addresses  and  network  name  oriented  addresses,  it   is
important  that  the  address  is  given fully. For example,
although many mailers in the uk.ac.  domain  can  handle  an
address  like  T.Clark@Warwick,  I  should  never  quote  my
address as such, it's useless to people outside  the  uk.ac.
domain unless they can work out that's where I am.

EARN, BITNET and UUCP network users often quote  their  node
name  without  mentioning  the network they are on, in which
case some detective work is required. EARN and BITNET  names
are never more than eight characters (but then very few UUCP
names are) and tend to be quoted in upper case, whilst  UUCP
names tend to be quoted in lower case.

If the indecipherable address appears in an  item  of  mail,

the  problem can be a lot easier to solve as the headers may
provide clues. For example something that has  come  through
uk.ac.nsfnet-relay  and  isi.edu is likely to have come from
one of the systems that the CMR (section 9.15) handles.

The second problem is that users sometimes quote the address
in  the  way  in which it has to be typed in to a particular
operating system. For example

     CBS%uk.ac.warwick::T.Clark

Is the way one would enter the address T.Clark@uk.ac.warwick
to  some VMS MAIL systems on JANET. Faced with a format like
that shown, one has to be able to unscramble it. As VMS MAIL
is the most common non-standard format one is likely to come
across, some guides on unscrambling it  may  be  of  use  to
non-VMS users.

You can generally ignore whatever name  appears  before  the
`%'. If there is just one `::' then the piece before this is
the site name and the piece after it the username. If  there
is  more  than  one  `::', then these separate the relays in
order. Hence

     rubbish%site::user

is   user@site

and

     rubbish%relay-1::relay-2::site::user

is   user%site%relay-2@relay-1

11.8 Mail gets Rejected

This topic could form a whole document by itself.  When  the
mail has been through a number of relays it can be difficult
to track down  precisely  what  went  wrong  where.  There's
nothing  to  beat  a  very careful examination of the entire
rejection message, including its own  headers.  Beware  that
the rejection message may well not originate from the system
which actually rejected the mail, but it is a report from  a
relay  that the system it tried to pass the mail on to would
not  accept  the  mail.  Whilst  engrossed  in  the  careful
examination  of  headers, don't ignore such simple things as
the user or system name being wrong.  It's easy  to  confuse
the  letter O and the digit 0, or the letter l and the digit
1. Worse mistakes are made if the address has been  conveyed
by handwriting or speech.

Because of the `domain problem'  (see  section  14.1),  even
with  the best efforts the wrong JANET gateway may have been
chosen. The only thing to do  then  is  make  five  separate

tries  explicitly  routing  the  mail  through the five main
JANET gateways listed in section 1.

12. OTHER INFORMATION SOURCES

`Communications  of  the  ACM'  had  an  excellent  article,
`Notable  Computer  Networks'  in  their  October 1986 issue
(Vol:29 No:10). It was written by  John  S.  Quarterman  and
Josiah  C.  Hoskins  and  runs  to  40  pages  in all. It is
obviously rather out of date now.

An updated version was published in the March 1987 issue  of
the  journal,  `Unix  Review',  entitled `Somewhere Over the
Network' and written by John S.  Quarterman.  (Published  by
Miller Freeman Publications Co., San Francisco.)

More  recent  still  is  the  book:  `The  Matrix:  Computer
Networks  Worldwide'  written by John S. Quarterman, ISBN 1-
55558-033-5, published by Digital Press.   DEC  part  number
EY-C176E-DP. US price $60. Available in the UK from:

                 Digital Equipment Corp Ltd
                 Educational Services
                 Shire Hall
                 Shinfield Park
                 READING Berks
                 RG2  9XY
                 tel: 0734 868711

The `Electronic Mail Guide' by Chris Benn and  Ralph  Martin
of   the   Royal   Greenwich  Observatory.   specialises  in
astronomical networks. It includes the actual  addresses  of
about 4000 astronomers. Copies from CRB@UK.AC.RGO.STAR

Another  useful  resource  is  the  `Directory  of  Research
Institutes  in  High  Energy Physics' CERN, GENEVA published
anually.  It lists along with loads of other  stuff  the  e-
mail  addresses  of all universities and institutes with any
High Energy Physics interest.

13. SUMMARY

I've built up a table of suggestions below which  summarises
the  information  above. I've put the suggestions into three
categories: (1) reasonably trustworthy, (2) probably  works,
(3) rather a wild shot.

Numbers in parentheses are references to notes at the end of
the  section.  The use of capital letters (shown in italics)
and the single italic letter a is also described there.

To            cataddress
ACSNET         1 U%a.A%uk.ac.ean-relay
APPLELINK      2 U%com.apple.applelink@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
ARISTOTE       1 a.F@uk.ac.mhs-relay
BITNET         1 U%H@uk.ac.earn-relay
BIX            2 U%net.das.dcibix@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
BMUG           2 U%org.fidonet.bmug@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
CANET          2 U%beijing%de.uka.ira@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
CANET          3 U%beijing%de.uka.ira@uk.ac.earn-relay
COMPUSERVE     2 U%com.compuserv@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
COMPUSERVE     2 U%com.compuserv.H@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
CONNECT        2 U%net.das.dcjcon@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
CSNET          1 U%Z%net.cs.relay@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
CSNET          1 U%Z%net.cs.relay@uk.ac.earn-relay
DARPA Internet 1 U%I.a@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
DARPA Internet 1 U%I.a@uk.ac.earn-relay
DARPA Internet 1 U%arpa.H@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
DARPA Internet 1 U%arpa.H@uk.ac.earn-relay
DEC's Easynet  1 U%H.dec%com.dec.decwrl@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
DEC's Easynet  2 U%H.dec%com.dec.decwrl@uk.ac.earn-relay
EAN            1 U%Z@uk.ac.ean-relay
EARN           1 U%H@uk.ac.earn-relay
FIDO           1 U%org.fidonet.zn.nn.fn.pn@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
GEONET         2 U%net.das.H@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
GOLD           2 intermail%edu.isi.intermail@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay  (2)
HEANET         1 U%E.a@uk.ac.earn-relay
HARNET         2 U%H%uucp.hkucs@uk.ac.ukc  (1)
HARNET         3 U%H%hkucs.uucp%net.uu.uunet@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
HEANET         1 U%E.a@uk.ac.earn-relay
IBM's VNET     1 U%vnet@uk.ac.earn-relay
INFNET         1 U%it.infn.H@uk.ac.earn-relay
JUNET          1 U%J.a@uk.ac.ukc  (1)
JUNET          2 U%J.a@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
JUNET          2 U%J.a@uk.ac.rl.earn
JUNET          2 U%a.J%net.cs.relay@uk.ac.rl.earn
MAILNET        1 U%mailnet.H@uk.ac.earn-relay
MCIMAIL        1 U%com.mci@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
MICROLINK      1 "/dd.un=U/"%gb.tmailuk.microlink@uk.ac.mhs-relay
MFENET         1 U%a@uk.ac.earn-relay
NASAMAIL       2 U%gov.nasa.nasamail@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
NETNORTH       1 U%H@uk.ac.earn-relay
NZ             2 U%N.a@uk.ac.ean-relay

NZ             1 U%N.a@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
SINET          2 U%com.slb.sinet.H@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
SPAN           2 "H::U"@uk.ac.span-relay
TELEMAIL       2 U%telemail%gov.nasa.arc.orion@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
UUCP           1 U%uucp.H@uk.ac.ukc  (1)
UUCP           1 U%Z@uk.ac.ukc  (1)
UUCP           2 U%H.uucp%net.uu.uunet@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
UUCP           2 U%Z%net.uu.uunet@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
UUCP           2 U%uucp.H@uk.ac.earn-relay
UUCP           2 U%H.uucp%mcvax@uk.ac.earn-relay
Xerox Internet 2 U.R%com.xerox@uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
Xerox Internet 2 U.R%com.xerox@uk.ac.earn-relay

Notes

(1)   Use only if your site subscribes for use of UKC
(2)   The text of the mail contains further addressing information

Italic capitals and a are used as follows:

U  denotes a user

H  denotes a single host name and does not contain any dots.

Z  denotes an arbitrary address within  the  network,  which
   may contain dots.

n  denotes a number

a  denotes a domain type address. It may contain dots and is
   either preceded or followed by a domain name. The meaning
   of the letter, and order in which the address  should  be
   given is indicated as follows:

   a.A An address in ACSNET/CSIRONET, ending with the domain
       name `.au' or `.oz'

   E.a An address in HEANET, starting with the  domain  name
       `ie.'

   a.F An address in ARISTOTE, ending with the  domain  name
       `.aristote.fr'

   a.I An address in the Internet, ending  with  the  domain
       name which is one of: `.com', `.edu', `.gov', `.net',
       `.org', `us'

   I.a An address in the Internet, starting with the  domain
       name which is one of: `com.', `edu.', `gov.', `net.',
       `org.', `us'

   a.J An address in JUNET,  ending  with  the  domain  name
       which  is  usually `.jp', though may also be `.junet'
       or `.jpn'

   J.a An address in JUNET, starting with  the  domain  name
       `jpn.'

   a.N An address in New Zealand,  ending  with  the  domain
       name `.nz'

   a.N An address in New Zealand, starting with  the  domain
       name `nz.'

   a.R An  address  in  Xerox  grapevine,  ending  with  the
       registry name, where R is the name of the registry.

14. DOMAINS

14.1 The Domain Problem

Unfortunately  it's  just  not  possible  to  always   route
according  to  the  domain.  For  example both EAN-RELAY and
EARN-RELAY handle sites in the domain `.ie'. Apparently  the
EARN-RELAY route is best.

Some domains are meant to indicate a particular network. For
example  `.edu'  should mean that the site is accessible via
the Internet. However, some sites on only UUCP have  adopted
names  ending  `.edu'  sometimes  without  taking  steps  to
register them with the  Internet.  (Or  at  least  that  the
appropriate  partial  domain  enabled source routing to work
over the Internet.) Many BITNET  sites  use  Internet  style
addresses, but most of these are registered with Internet.

Domain style addresses are  nicer  for  users  to  use,  the
problem  is  that  the  electronic  mail  networks  are  not
generally in a good enough state to make use  of  them  with
high reliability.

Despite analysis to greater than the top domain level, it is
not  always  possible to predict with high accuracy the best
JANET gateway one should forward the mail to.  In many cases
the mail will find its way through. But there are also cases
where it won't work, and one has  to  explicitly  route  the
mail through another gateway.

14.2 Partial Domain Routing

The NRS (see section 1.2) has some  information  on  partial
domain  routing.   Below  is  a suggestion for a table which
could be used to do the job more completely. Note that it is
only  a  suggestion,  if  you  know  better for a particular
entry, then drop the one suggested here. It's not  complete;
a  better  job  could be done by regularly getting a copy of
ean.sites.raw (see section 7) and making full  use  of  that
too.

It has flaws: it can not  cope  with  UUCP  addresses  which
aren't in the UUCP maps.

Since the route taken  to  reach  a  particular  person  may
depend on whether they themselves are registered for receipt
of mail by  one  method  or  another,  the  suggestions  can
obviously not cope with that sort of detail.

You may wish to try inverting an address before matching  it
to the component on the left of the table. I refuse to enter
into the `holy wars' on whether this is a good idea or  not!
The   ordering   used  on  the  left  is  the  UK  ordering,

domain.place.machine.

14.2 How to Use the Partial Domain Table

The table is designed to work on addresses of the form:

     left-part@right-part

which contain only one `@'. The left-part is never  touched.
If   the  right-part  is  not  recognizable  as  an  address
registered in the NRS, scan the table sequentially, from the
top, until a match is obtained between the whole of the item
in the first column of the table  and  same  number  of  dot
separated  components  at  the start of the right-part. This
may or may not match all the components in  the  right-part.
Ignore upper/lower case differences.

If a match is  obtained,  consult  the  Flags  column,  this
indicates a number of actions to perform, or checks to make.
They must be done in the order the flags are  given  in  the
column.  They are as follows:

I    Invert the order of the dot separated components in the
     right-part.     E.g.    domain.place.machine    becomes
     machine.place.domain.

K    Count this as a match only if your site  subscribes  to
     UKC.

N    Count this as a match if your site does  not  subscribe
     to UKC.

P    Prepend the contents of the right column to the  right-
     part, ensuring that it is separated by a dot.

Rn   Remove the first n dot separated  components  from  the
     right-part.

Now check the right column. If it is not empty, and has  not
been used up by a P key, change the `@' in your address to a
`%' add an `@' to the end followed by the  contents  of  the
right colum.  This now becomes the new right-part.

If the new right-part is still not an NRS registered address
then  repeat the whole process using the new right-part, and
scan from the top of the table again.

14.4 The Partial Domain Table

     domain                   keys   relay/alteration

     yu.jumail                       uk.ac.ean-relay
     wustl                           uk.ac.earn-relay
     weslyn                          uk.ac.earn-relay
     vnet                            uk.ac.earn-relay
     uucp                      NI    net.uu.uunet
     uucp                      K     uk.ac.ukc
     utoronto                        uk.ac.earn-relay
     us                              uk.ac.ukc
     uninett                         uk.ac.ean-relay
     uk.co                           uk.ac.ukc
     telemail                        gov.nasa.arc.orion
     surf.kun                        uk.ac.ean-relay
     span                      I     edu.stanford.star
     sinet                     P     com.slb
     sg.ac                           uk.ac.earn-relay
     se                              uk.ac.ean-relay
     riup.ctt.inesc                  uk.ac.ean-relay
     pt.ctt.inesc                    uk.ac.ean-relay
     oz                              uk.ac.ean-relay
     osiride.cnr.iasi                uk.ac.ean-relay
     org                             uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
     nz                              uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
     no                              uk.ac.earn-relay
     nl                              uk.ac.earn-relay
     netnorth                        uk.ac.earn-relay
     net                             uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
     nasamail                  P     gov.nasa
     mfenet                          uk.ac.earn-relay
     mcimail                   P     com
     mailnet                         uk.ac.earn-relay
     kr                              uk.ac.ean-relay
     junet                     NI    net.uu.uunet
     junet                     K     uk.ac.ukc
     jpn                       NI    net.uu.uunet
     jpn                       K     uk.ac.ukc
     jp.ac                           uk.ac.earn-relay
     jp                        N     uk.ac.earn-relay
     jp                        K     uk.ac.ukc
     it                              uk.ac.earn-relay
     isanet.hi.rhi                   uk.ac.ean-relay
     is                              uk.ac.earn-relay
     irl.heanet               R2P    ie
     irl.hean                 R2P    ie
     irl                      R1P    ie
     iris                     R1P    es
     infnet                   R1P    it.infn
     il                              uk.ac.earn-relay
     ie                              uk.ac.earn-relay
     hepnet                          uk.ac.earn-relay
     hasler.kom.vax2                 uk.ac.ean-relay
     guelph                          uk.ac.earn-relay
     gov                             uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
     geonet                   R1P    net.das
     gb.gold-400                     uk.ac.mhs-relay
     gb.btmhs                        uk.ac.mhs-relay
     funet                           uk.ac.ean-relay
     fr                              uk.ac.mhs-relay
     fi                              uk.ac.ean-relay
     es.etsitm                       uk.ac.ean-relay
     edu                             uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
     earn                            uk.ac.earn-relay
     dk                              uk.ac.ean-relay
     dfn                      R1P    de.dbp
     dec                       I     com.dec.decwrl
     de.dbp.siemens-ag.ap11          uk.ac.mhs-relay
     de.dbp.nixdorf.nme              uk.ac.mhs-relay
     de.dbp                          uk.ac.ean-relay
     de                              uk.ac.earn-relay
     csnet                     I     net.cs.relay
     connect                  R1P    net.das.dcjcon
     compuserve                P     com
     com                             uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
     chunet                          uk.ac.earn-relay
     ch.cern                         uk.ac.earn-relay
     ch                              uk.ac.ean-relay
     cern                            uk.ac.earn-relay
     cdn                             uk.ac.ean-relay
     ca                              uk.ac.ean-relay
     bmug                      P     org.fidonet
     bix                      R1P    net.das.dcibix
     bitnet                          uk.ac.earn-relay
     be.rtt.fundp.info               uk.ac.ean-relay
     be                              uk.ac.earn-relay
     aut                             uk.ac.earn-relay
     au.oz                     R1
     au                              uk.ac.ean-relay
     at.una                          uk.ac.earn-relay
     at.ptt                          uk.ac.ean-relay
     arpa                            uk.ac.nsfnet-relay
     applelink                 P     com.apple

14.3 Examples

Suppose we have the address:

     graf@dfn.gmd.zix

`graf' is the left-part and  `dfn.gmd.zix'  the  right-part,
and  it's  not  an NRS registered address. Scanning down the
table we get a match on `dfn'. The keys tell  us  to  remove
the  first  component  (leaving `gmd.zix') and add `de.dbp'.
Our new right-part is therefore  `de.dbp.gmd.zix'.  This  is
still not an NRS registered address, so we start the process
again. This time the `de.dbp' matches an entry, there are no
flags, and there is an entry in the right column. So we turn
the existing `@'  to  a  `%'  (giving  a  new  left-part  of
`graf%de.dbp.gmd.zix'   and   then   add  the  right  column
(uk.ac.ean-relay) after an `@' as the new  right-part.  This
time  it  is  registered  in  the NRS, so we can now use the
address, it's:

     graf%de.dbp.gmd.zix@uk.ac.ean-relay

Take another example:

     Harry%iapetus@SPAN.saturn

The left-part  is  `Harry%iapetus'  and  the  right-part  is
`SPAN.saturn'.  It's  not  in  the NRS, and the table gets a
match at `span', where  the  key  tells  us  to  invert  the
right-part,   becoming   `saturn.SPAN'.   The  right  column
demands that we change the `@' to a `%',  making  the  left-
part  now  `Harry%iapetus%saturn.span',  and  pick  up a new
right-part of `edu.stanford.star'. That's still not  in  the
NRS.  Into the table again, from the top, and we get a match
on `edu'. No  flags,  but  we  pick  up  a  new  right  part
(uk.ac.nsfnet-relay),  which is NRS registered, so we end up
with:

     Harry%iapetus%saturn.span%edu.stanford.star@uk.ac.nsfnet-
     relay

As it happens, that's not the  best  route,  but  the  table
can't  cope with the re-arrangement of the username required
to route it via uk.ac.span-relay

15. INDEX TO NETWORKS

Networks mentioned in this document  and  the  section  they
appear in.

acsnet  9.4                     mcimail  9.17
applelink  9.19                 memocom  9.15
arpanet  4                      mfenet  9.23
ati  9.15                       microlink  9.22
att  9.23                       nasamail  9.23
bitnet  3                       netnorth  3
bix  9.23                       nsfmail  9.15
bmug  9.23                      nsfnet  4
bt gold  9.13                   omnet  9.15
canet  9.12                     phonenet  6
cmr  9.15                       pipmail  9.15
compmail  9.15                  sdn  9.6
compuserve  9.20                sinet  9.23
connect  9.23                   span  9.7
correo pemex  9.15              starnet  9.15
csironet  9.4                   tbxspa  9.15
csnet  6                        telebox  9.15
darpa  4                        telecom  9.15
dearn  3                        telecom gold  9.13
decnet  9.8                     telemail  9.16
dgc  9.15                       telememo  9.15
dialcom  9.15                   tm11  9.15
dpt databoks  9.15              tmailuk  9.15
ean  7                          tommail  9.15
earn  3                         ttns  9.15
easynet  9.8                    tuai  9.3
eirmail  9.15                   uknet  5
eunet  5                        usdamail  9.15
faamail  9.15                   usent  5
fidonet  9.18                   uucp  5
frearn  3                       vnet  9.10
geonet  9.23                    x.400  7
gold  9.13                      xerox RIN  9.9
goldnet  9.15
grapevine  9.9
gsfc  9.15
gtemail  9.15
harnet  9.11
heanet  9.5
ibm  9.10
infnet  9.2
intermail  9.15
internet  4
italmail  9.15
janet  1
junet  8
keylink  9.15
mailnet  9.1
mastermail  9.15

16. SIGNATURES

It's often worthwhile adding a `signature' line to  outgoing
mail  headed  for places other than on JANET. A short signa-
ture should suffice most of the time.  E.g.

     Tim Clark
     T.Clark@warwick.ac.uk (JANET: T.Clark@uk.ac.warwick)

If you want to cram into it as much  help  as  possible  for
those  who  may not be able to make use of that, then I sug-
gest something like the one below. I would not get a  mailer
to  add  the long signature automatically (it's too long for
some anyway).

Tim Clark
T.Clark@warwick.ac.uk                             Post:    Computing Services
JANET: T.Clark@uk.ac.warwick                    |          University of Warwick
Internet: T.Clark%warwick.ac.uk@cunyvm.cuny.edu |          Coventry,  UK
EARN/BITNET: T.Clark%warwick.ac.uk@UKACRL       |          CV4 7AL
UUCP: T.Clark%warwick.ac.uk@ukc.uucp            | Phone:   +44 203 523224
